:::A short_squeeze::: is a situation in which a heavily shorted stock or commodity moves sharply higher, forcing more short sellers to close out their short positions and adding to the upward pressure on the stock. It implies that short sellers are being squeezed out of their short positions, usually at a loss, and is generally triggered by a positive development that suggests the stock may be embarking on a turnaround. Although the turnaround in the stock’s fortunes may only prove to be temporary, few short sellers can afford to risk runaway losses on their short positions and may prefer to close them out even if it means taking a substantial loss.
:::A short:::, or short_position:, is selling first and then buying later. The trader's expectation is that the price will drop; the price they sell at is higher than the price they buy it at later. The difference between the sale price and the buy price produces a profit or loss. In the forex and futures markets, a short position can be initiated at any time. In the stock market, the trader must borrow shares from a broker in order to short them. This creates a share deficient in the account. When the trader buys the shares back, the borrowed shares are returned to the broker and the profit or loss on the trade is realized.
:::Price_action::: refers to the movement of a security's price and is encompassed in technical analysis. For example, a trader might say that a security's price action lends credibility to buyout rumors. Many short-term traders rely exclusively on price action to make trading decisions. Technical analysis is a derivative of price action since it uses past prices in calculations that can then be used to inform trading decisions.
:::Technical_indicators::: are mathematical calculations based on the price, volume, or open interest of a security or contract. By analyzing historical data, technical analysts use indicators to predict future price movements. Examples of common technical indicators include Relative Strength Index, Money Flow Index, Stochastics, MACD and Bollinger Bands.
:::Whipsaw::: describes the movement of a security when, at a certain time, the security's price is moving in one direction but then quickly pivots to move in the opposite direction. There are two types of whipsaw patterns. The first involves an upward movement in a share price, which is then followed by a drastic downward move causing the share's price to fall relative to its original position. The second type occurs when a share price drops in value for a short time and then suddenly surges upward to a positive gain relative to the stock's original position.
:::Many investors use a risk/reward_ratio::: to compare the expected returns of an investment with the amount of risk undertaken to capture these returns. This ratio is calculated mathematically by dividing the amount the individual stands to lose if the price of an asset moves in the unexpected direction (the risk) by the amount of profit the trader expects to have made when the position is closed (the reward).
:::A long::: (or long position:) is the buying of a security such as a stock, commodity or currency with the expectation that the asset will rise in value. In the context of options, long is the buying of an options contract. An investor that expects an asset’s price to fall will go long on a put option, and an investor that hopes to benefit from an upward price movement will be long a call option.
:::The_Relative_Strength_Index::: - RSI::: is a momentum indicator that measures the magnitude of recent price changes to analyze overbought or oversold conditions. It is primarily used to attempt to identify overbought or oversold conditions in the trading of an asset.
:::Risk_tolerance::: is the degree of variability in investment returns that an investor is willing to withstand. Risk tolerance is an important component in investing. You should have a realistic understanding of your ability and willingness to stomach large swings in the value of your investments; if you take on too much risk, you might panic and sell at the wrong time.      BREAKING DOWN 'Risk Tolerance'     Risk tolerance assessments for investors abound, including risk-related surveys or questionnaires. As an investor, you may also want to review historical worst-case returns for different asset classes to get an idea of how much money you would feel comfortable losing if your investments have a bad year or bad series of years. Other factors affecting risk tolerance are the time horizon you have to invest, your future earning capacity, and the presence of other assets such as a home, pension, Social Security or an inheritance. In general, you can take greater risk with investable assets when you have other, more stable sources of funds available.     Aggressive Risk Tolerance     Aggressive investors tend to be market-savvy. A deep understanding of securities and their propensities allows such individuals and institutional investors to purchase highly volatile instruments, such as small company stocks that can plummet to zero or options contracts that can expire worthless. While maintaining a base of riskless securities, aggressive investors reach for maximum returns with maximum risk.
:::A correction::: is a movement, almost always temporary and happening in reverse, that accounts for at least a 10 percent adjustment to fix the overvaluation of a stock, bond, commodity or index.
Consolidation is a technical analysis term referring to security prices oscillating within a corridor and is generally interpreted as :::market indecisiveness. Said another way, consolidation is used in technical analysis to describe the movement of a stock's price within a well-defined pattern of trading levels. Consolidation is generally regarded as a period of indecision, which ends when the price of the asset moves above or below the prices in the trading pattern. Consolidation is also defined as a set of financial statements that presents a parent and a subsidiary company as one company.
https://coinmarketcap.com/
https://www.binance.com/en/trade/ETH_USDT
https://www.investopedia.com/articles/active-trading/022715/20-rules-followed-professional-traders.asp
https://www.investopedia.com/articles/02/051502.asp
https://www.investopedia.com/articles/active-trading/010815/what-it-takes-become-elite-trader.asp
https://www.investopedia.com/insights/macroeconomic-analysis/
https://www.investopedia.com/articles/trading/04/011404.asp
https://www.google.com/search?q=site:investopedia.com/terms
:::Due_diligence::: is an investigation or audit of a potential investment or product to confirm all facts, such as reviewing all financial records, plus anything else deemed material. It refers to the care a reasonable person should take before entering into an agreement or a financial transaction with another party. Due diligence can also refer to the investigation a seller does of a buyer; items that may be considered are whether the buyer has adequate resources to complete the purchase, as well as other elements that would affect the acquired entity or the seller after the sale has been completed.
:::Return_on_Investment::: (ROI:) is a performance measure, used to evaluate the efficiency of an investment or compare the efficiency of a number of different investments. ROI measures the amount of return on an investment, relative to the investment’s cost. To calculate ROI, the benefit (or return) of an investment is divided by the cost of the investment. The result is expressed as a percentage or a ratio.
:::Technical_analysis::: is a trading discipline employed to evaluate securities and identify trading opportunities by analyzing statistics gathered from trading activity, such as price movement and volume. Unlike fundamental analysts, who attempt to evaluate a security's intrinsic value, technical analysts focus on charts of price movement and various analytical tools to evaluate a security's strength or weakness.
:::A security::: is a fungible, negotiable financial instrument that holds some type of monetary value. It represents an ownership position in a publicly-traded corporation (via stock), a creditor relationship with a governmental body or a corporation (represented by owning that entity's bond), or rights to ownership as represented by an option.
:::Financial_risk::: is the possibility that shareholders or other financial stakeholders will lose money when they invest in a company that has debt if the company's cash flow proves inadequate to meet its financial obligations. When a company uses debt financing, its creditors are repaid before shareholders if the company becomes insolvent. Financial risk also refers to the possibility of a corporation or government defaulting on its bonds, which would cause those bondholders to lose money.
:::An investment_vehicle::: is a product used by investors with the intention of gaining positive returns. Investment vehicles can be low risk, such as certificates of deposit (CD) or bonds, or carry a greater degree of risk such as with stocks, options and futures. Other types of investment vehicles include annuities; collectibles, such as art or coins; mutual funds; and exchange-traded funds (ETFs).
:::Financial_instruments::: are assets that can be traded. They can also be seen as packages of capital that may be traded. Most types of financial instruments provide an efficient flow and transfer of capital all throughout the world's investors. These assets can be cash, a contractual right to deliver or receive cash or another type of financial instrument, or evidence of one's ownership of an entity.
:::An exchange::: is a marketplace in which securities, commodities, derivatives and other financial instruments are traded. The core function of an exchange is to ensure fair and orderly trading and the efficient dissemination of price information for any securities trading on that exchange. Exchanges give companies, governments and other groups a platform from which to sell securities to the investing public.
:::Margin::: is the difference between the total value of securities held in an investor's account and the loan amount from a broker. Buying on margin is the act of borrowing money to buy securities. The practice includes buying an asset where the buyer pays only a percentage of the asset's value and borrows the rest from the bank or broker. The broker acts as a lender and the securities in the investor's account act as collateral.
:::A stop-loss_order::: is an order placed with a broker to sell a security when it reaches a certain price. Stop-loss orders are designed to limit an investor’s loss on a position in a security. Although most investors associate a stop-loss order with a long position, it can also protect a short position, in which case the security gets bought if it trades above a defined price.
:::A protective_stop::: is a strategy designed to protect existing gains or thwart further losses by means of a stop-loss order or limit order. A protective stop is set to activate at a certain price level and assures that an investor will make a predetermined profit or lose a predetermined amount. For example, if one buys a stock for $50 and wishes to limit losses to 10%, one would simply set a protective stop at $45.
A capital_loss is the loss incurred when a capital asset, such as an investment or real estate, decreases in value. This loss is not realized until the asset is sold for a price that is lower than the original purchase price. A capital loss is essentially the difference between the purchase price and the price at which the asset is sold, where the sale price is lower than the purchase price. For example, if an investor bought a house for $250,000 and sold the house five years later for $200,000, the investor realizes a capital loss of $50,000.
:::The_standard_deviation::: is a statistic that measures the dispersion of a dataset relative to its mean and is calculated as the square root of the variance. It is calculated as the square root of variance by determining the variation between each data point relative to the mean. If the data points are further from the mean, there is higher deviation within the data set; thus, the more spread out the data, the higher the standard deviation. In finance, standard deviation is a statistical measurement; when applied to the annual rate of return of an investment, it sheds light on the historical volatility of that investment. The greater the standard deviation of a security, the greater the variance between each price and the mean, which shows a larger price range. For example, a volatile stock has a high standard deviation, while the deviation of a stable blue-chip stock is usually rather low.
:::Weighted_average::: is an average in which each observation in the data set is assigned or multiplied by a weight before summing to a single average value. It is an average in which each quantity to be averaged is assigned a weight where these weightings determine the relative importance of each quantity on the average. Weightings are the equivalent of having that many like items with the same value involved in the average.
:::A moving_average: (MA:::) is a widely used indicator in technical analysis that helps smooth out price action by filtering out the “noise” from random price fluctuations. It is a trend-following, or lagging, indicator because it is based on past prices. The two basic and commonly used moving averages are the simple_moving_average (SMA), which is the simple average of a security over a defined number of time periods, and the exponential moving average (EMA), which gives greater weight to more recent prices. The most common applications of moving averages are to identify the trend direction, and to determine support and resistance levels. While moving averages are useful enough on their own, they also form the basis for other technical indicators such as the Moving Average Convergence Divergence (MACD).
:::A bottom::: is the lowest price reached by a financial security, commodity, index or economic cycle in a given time period. A specific time span is usually used to determine a bottom, and that timeframe can be a year, month or even intraday. To determine the future price of an investment, technical analysts determine the bottom for a particular security.
:::Resistance:::, or a resistance_level:, is the price point at which the rise in the price of a stock or a stock index is halted by the emergence of a growing number of sellers who wish to sell the stock at that price. Resistance levels can be short lived if new information comes to light that changes the overall market’s attitude toward a stock, or they can be long lasting. 
:::A support::: or support_level: is a financial term that refers to the price level that historically a stock does not fall below. Buyers tend to purchase the stock at this level.
:::A test::: is when a stock’s price approaches an established support or resistance level set by the market. If the stock stays within the support and resistance levels, the test passes. However, if the stock price reaches new lows and/or new highs, the test fails.
:::A Breakout::: refers to a security's price movement through a historical resistance level. A breakout typically precedes heavy trading volume and increased volatility.  
:::A failed_break::: occurs when a price moves through an identified level of support or resistance but does not have enough momentum to maintain its direction. Since the validity of the breakout is compromised and the profit potential significantly decreases, many traders close their positions. A failed break is also commonly referred to as a "false breakout."
:::Volatility::: is a statistical measure of the dispersion of returns for a given security or market index. Volatility can either be measured by using the standard deviation or variance between returns from that same security or market index. Commonly, the higher the volatility, the riskier the security. 2. A variable in option pricing formulas showing the extent to which the return of the underlying asset will fluctuate between now and the option's expiration. Volatility, as expressed as a percentage coefficient within option-pricing formulas, arises from daily trading activities. How volatility is measured will affect the value of the coefficient used.
:::Speed_resistance_lines::: are a tool in technical analysis that is used for determining potential areas of support and resistance. This tool, consisting of three trend lines, is created by drawing the first trend line from the most recent low to the most recent high when the asset is in an uptrend, and from the most recent high to the most recent low when the asset is in a downtrend. The other two trend lines are drawn with smaller angles in an attempt to predict areas that will act as possible barriers in the event of a retracement.
:::The_neckline::: is a level of support or resistance found on a head and shoulders pattern that is used by traders to determine strategic areas to place orders. Each peak of a regular head and shoulders pattern falls toward a support level, also known as a neckline, before it rises to create the next peak. A move below the neckline (in the case of a head and shoulders top) is used by traders as a signal of a reversal of the current uptrend.
:::A trading_channel::: is a channel drawn on a security price series chart by graphing two trendlines drawn at resistance and support levels. Trading channels can be drawn using a variety of methodologies. Generally traders believe that security prices will remain within a trading channel. Therefore, traders use trading channels to develop buy and sell trading signals. A trading channel may also be known as a price channel.
:::A trendline::: is a line drawn over pivot highs or under pivot lows to show the prevailing direction of price. Trendlines are a visual representation of support and resistance in any timeframe. They show direction and speed of price, and also describe patterns during periods of price contraction.
:::Trigger_line::: refers to a moving-average plotted with the moving average convergence divergence (MACD) indicator that is used to generate buy and sell signals in a security. The trigger line, or signal line, is a nine-period exponential moving average (EMA) of the MACD indicator line used by traders to predict future price trends. Although the nine-period EMA is the trigger line’s default setting, traders can adjust the EMA’s length to suit their trading strategy.
:::The_top_line::: is a reference to gross figures reported by a company, such as sales or revenue. It is called the top line because it the first line item on a company's financial statement, such as the first entry at the top of a company's income statement, and is most often reserved for the reporting of gross sales or revenue. A company that increases its revenue is said to be growing its top line or generating top-line growth.
:::A trade_line::: is a record of activity for any type of credit extended to a borrower and reported to a credit reporting agency. A trade line is established on a borrower’s credit report when a borrower is approved for credit. The trade line records all of the activity associated with an account. Comprehensively trade lines are used by credit reporting agencies to calculate a borrower’s credit score. Different credit reporting agencies give differing weights to the activities of trade lines when establishing a credit score for borrowers.
:::The_Kijun_Line::: is the midpoint between the highest high and lowest low of a security over a specified period of time, and is used in the creation of the Ichimoku Cloud. It's one of the two moving average lines displayed on the chart, and is a 26-period moving average. Also, called Kijun-Sen Line.
:::An exponential_moving_average::: - EMA is a type of moving average that places a greater weight and significance on the most recent data points. The exponential moving average - EMA is also referred to as the exponentially weighted moving average. Exponentially weighted moving averages react more significantly to recent price changes than a simple moving average, which applies an equal weight to all observations in the period.
:::Signal_lines::: are used in technical indicators, especially oscillators, to generate buy and sell signals or suggest a change in a trend. Often times, signal lines are moving averages of a technical indicator, such as the moving average convergence-divergence (MACD) and stochastics oscillator. A signal line is also commonly known as a "trigger line."
:::The_crossover::: is a point on the trading chart in which a security and an indicator intersect. It is used to estimate the performance of a financial instrument and to predict coming changes.
:::A histogram::: is a graphical representation that organizes a group of data points into user-specified ranges. It is similar in appearance to a bar graph. The histogram condenses a data series into an easily interpreted visual by taking many data points and grouping them into logical ranges or bins.
:::A price_by_volume:::, or PBV:, chart is a horizontal histogram plotted on a security's chart showing the volume of shares traded at a specific price level. Often times, price by volume histograms are found on the Y-axis and are used by technical traders to predict areas of support and resistance. Also, known as volume by price charts.
:::A bar_graph::: is a chart that plots data using rectangular bars (called bins) that represent the total amount of observations in the data for that category. A bar chart is a style of bar graph; it is often used to represent the price range of a stock over a single day. In finance and economics, an example of a bar graph is one that compares median household income for several states, in which one axis represents different categories, the different states, and the other represents a discrete range of data points, median income.
:::A risk_graph::: is a two-dimensional graphical representation that displays the range of profit or loss possibilities for an option at various prices in the underlying asset. The x-axis represents the price of the underlying security and the y-axis represents the potential profit/loss. Often called a "profit/loss diagram or p&l graph", this graph provides an easy way to understand and visualize the effects of what may happen to an option under various situations. Risk graphs can be drawn to show the potential payoffs for single options as well as for spreads or combination strategies.
:::Risk_averse::: is the description of an investor who, when faced with two investments with a similar expected return, prefers the one with the lower risk. 
:::A risk_profile::: is an evaluation of an individual's willingness and ability to take risks. It can also refer to the threats to which an organization is exposed. A risk profile is important for determining a proper investment asset allocation for a portfolio. Organizations use a risk profile as a way to mitigate potential risks and threats.
:::Conservative_investing::: is an investing strategy that seeks to preserve an investment portfolio's value by investing in lower risk securities such as fixed-income and money market securities, and often blue-chip or large-cap equities.
:::Risk::: takes on many forms but is broadly categorized as the chance an outcome or investment's actual return will differ from the expected outcome or return. Risk includes the possibility of losing some or all of the original investment. Different versions of risk are usually measured by calculating the standard deviation of the historical returns or average returns of a specific investment.
:::Market_risk::: is the possibility of an investor experiencing losses due to factors that affect the overall performance of the financial markets in which he or she is involved. Market risk, also called "systematic risk," cannot be eliminated through diversification, though it can be hedged against. Sources of market risk include recessions, political turmoil, changes in interest rates, natural disasters and terrorist attacks.
In the financial world, :::risk_management::: is the process of identification, analysis and acceptance or mitigation of uncertainty in investment decisions. Essentially, risk management occurs when an investor or fund manager analyzes and attempts to quantify the potential for losses in an investment and then takes the appropriate action (or inaction) given his investment objectives and risk tolerance.
:::The_risk-return_tradeoff::: states that the potential return rises with an increase in risk. Using this principle, individuals associate low levels of uncertainty with low potential returns, and high levels of uncertainty or risk with high potential returns. According to the risk-return tradeoff, invested money can render higher profits only if the investor will accept a higher possibility of losses.
:::Risk_assessment::: is a general term used across many industries to determine the likelihood of loss on an asset, loan, or investment. Assessing risk is essential for determining the worthwhile of an investment and the best process(es) to mitigate risk, and it presents the upside reward compared to the risk profile. It also determines the rate of return necessary to make a particular investment succeed.
:::The_2%_rule::: is a money management strategy where an investor risks no more than 2% of available capital on a single trade. To implement the 2% rule, the investor first calculates 2% of their available trading capital; this is referred to as the capital at risk. Brokerage fees for buying and selling shares are factored into the capital at risk to calculate the maximum permissible risk. The maximum permissible risk is then divided by the stop-loss amount to determine the number of shares that can be purchased.
:::Downside_risk::: is an estimation of a security's potential to suffer a decline in value if the market conditions change, or the amount of loss that could be sustained as a result of the decline. Depending on the measure used, downside risk explains a worst case scenario for an investment or indicates how much the investor stands to lose. Downside risk measures are considered one-sided tests since they do not care about the symmetric case of upside potential, but only about potential losses.
:::Expected_return::: is the profit or loss an investor anticipates on an investment that has known or expected rates of return. It is calculated by multiplying potential outcomes by the chances of them occurring and then summing these results. For example, if an investment has a 50% chance of gaining 20% and a 50% change of losing 10%, the expected return is (50% * 20% + 50% * -10%), or 5%.
:::The_Sharpe_ratio::: is the average return earned in excess of the risk-free rate per unit of volatility or total risk. Subtracting the risk-free rate from the mean return, the performance associated with risk-taking activities can be isolated. One intuition of this calculation is that a portfolio engaging in “zero risk” investment, such as the purchase of U.S. Treasury bills (for which the expected return is the risk-free rate), has a Sharpe ratio of exactly zero. Generally, the greater the value of the Sharpe ratio, the more attractive the risk-adjusted return. The Sharpe Ratio was developed by Nobel laureate William F. Sharpe.
:::The_Volcker_Rule::: is a federal regulation that generally prohibits banks from conducting certain investment activities with their own accounts and limits their dealings with hedge funds and private equity funds, also called covered funds. The Volcker Rule aims to protect bank customers by preventing banks from making certain types of speculative investments that contributed to the 2008 financial crisis.
:::The_rule_of_72::: is a shortcut to estimate the number of years required to double your money at a given annual rate of return. The rule states that you divide the rate, expressed as a percentage, into 72: Years required to double investment = 72 ÷ compound annual interest rate
:::A line_graph::: that displays the intraday movements of a given security. This contrasts to longer term charts, such as those that show a security’s movement over a period of days, months, or even years. Daily charts may also refer to charts that show each bar or trading session as a single day rather than a week or month.
:::A line_chart::: connects a series of data points with a line and is used by traders to monitor closing prices. This is the most basic type of chart used in finance and is created by joining a series of closing prices together. Line charts can be used on any timeframe.
:::A cup_and_handle_price_pattern::: on bar charts resembles a cup and handle where the cup is in the shape of a "U" and the handle has a slight downward drift. The right-hand side of the pattern typically has low trading volume, and may be as short as seven weeks or as long as 65 weeks.
:::Indicators::: are statistics used to measure current conditions as well as to forecast financial or economic trends.
:::Market_indicators::: are a subset of technical indicators used to predict the direction of major financial indexes rather than individual securities.
:::The_Positive_Directional_Indicator::: (+DI:) is a component of the Average Directional Index (ADX) and is used to measure the presence of an uptrend.
:::The_volume_price_trend::: (VPT:::) indicator helps determine a security's price direction and strength of price change.
:::The_parabolic_indicator:::, developed by J. Wells Wilder, is used by traders to determine a trend's direction.
:::A lagging_indicator::: is an economic factor that trails macro changes and a technical indicator that trails price action, in both cases framing a trend.
:::Volume::: is the number of shares or contracts traded in a security or an entire market during a given period of time. For every buyer, there is a seller, and each transaction contributes to the count of total volume. That is, when buyers and sellers agree to make a transaction at a certain price, it is considered one transaction. If only five transactions occur in a day, the volume for the day is five.
:::A pullback:::, also referred to as a retracement or consolidation, is the falling back of a security’s price from its peak. These price movements might be seen as a brief reversal of the prevailing trend higher, signaling a temporary pause in upward momentum. 
:::A throwback::: can occur after a price breaks through its resistance line on a technical chart. A throwback is the opposite of a retraction after a price breaks through its support line on a technical chart. A throwback pattern will show a price moving higher through its resistance but then retracting towards the resistance line.
:::A blow-off_top::: is a chart pattern that indicates a steep and rapid increase in a security’s price and trading volume followed by a steep and rapid drop in price and volume. The rapid changes indicated by a blow-off top, also called a blow-off move or exhaustion move, can be the result of actual news or pure speculation.
:::A shakeout::: is a situation in which many investors exit their positions, often at a loss, because of uncertainty or recent bad news circulating around a particular security or industry. During the dotcom boom and bust, numerous shakeouts occurred. During these shakeouts, many investors experienced tremendous losses.
:::A low_volume_pullback::: is a technical correction toward an area of support that occurs on lower-than-average volume. Since the move occurs on low volume, traders often attribute the pullback to weak longs locking in profits rather than a reversal.
:::A reversal::: is a change in the direction of a price trend, which can be a positive or negative change against the prevailing trend. On a price chart, reversals undergo a recognizable change in the price structure. A reversal is also referred to as a trend reversal, a rally or a correction.
:::A retracement::: is a temporary reversal in the direction of a stock's price that goes against the prevailing trend. A retracement does not signify a change in the larger trend. On a chart where a stock's price is generally headed upward, retracements are the small dips in price that the stock experiences during its overall upward trend.
:::A technical_correction::: is a decrease in the market price of an asset or entire market after extensive price increases. A technical correction occurs even when there is no evidence that the increasing price trend should cease. A correction is typically a change of 10% or more from the peak high or low however traders may use varying percentage levels. A technical correction is often caused when investors temporarily slow down their purchases of securities, which commonly leads to a throwback or pullback toward resistance or support levels respectively.
:::An uptrend::: describes the price movement of a financial asset when the overall direction is upward. In an uptrend, each successive peak and trough is higher than the ones found earlier in the trend. In the example below, notice how each successive high and low is located above the previous ones. For example, the high at point 4 is above the high at point 2 and the low at point 5 is above the low at point 3. The uptrend is broken if the next low on the chart falls below point 5. The opposite of an uptrend in a downtrend.
:::A Fibonacci_retracement::: is a term used in technical analysis that refers to areas of support (stops going lower) or resistance (stops going higher). Fibonacci retracement levels use horizontal lines to indicate areas of support or resistance at the key Fibonacci levels before the trend continues in the original direction. These levels are created by drawing a trendline between the high and low and then dividing the vertical distance by the key Fibonacci ratios of 23.6%, 38.2%, 50%, 61.8% and 100%.
:::Small_cap::: is a term used to classify companies with a relatively small market capitalization. A company's market capitalization is the market value of its outstanding shares. The definition of small cap can vary among brokerages, but it is generally a company with a market capitalization of between $300 million and $2 billion. 
:::Large_ca::: (sometimes "big_cap:::") refers to a company with a market capitalization value of more than $10 billion. Large cap is a shortened version of the term "large market capitalization." Market capitalization is calculated by multiplying the number of a company's shares outstanding by its stock price per share. A company’s stock is generally classified as large cap, mid cap or small cap.
:::Backtesting::: assesses the viability of a trading strategy by discovering how it would play out with historical data.
:::The_satoshi::: is the smallest unit of the Bitcoin cryptocurrency. It is named after Satoshi Nakamoto, the creator of the protocol used in blockchains and the bitcoin cryptocurrency.
:::A black_swan::: is an event or occurrence that deviates beyond what is normally expected of a situation and is extremely difficult to predict. Black swan events are typically random and unexpected.
:::Altcoins::: are the alternative cryptocurrencies launched after the success of Bitcoin. Generally, they project themselves as better substitutes to Bitcoin. The success of Bitcoin as the first peer-to-peer digital currency paved the way for many to follow. Many altcoins are trying to target any perceived limitations that Bitcoin has and come up with newer versions with competitive advantages. As the term 'altcoins' means all cryptocurrencies which are not Bitcoin, there are hundreds of altcoins.
:::Bitcoin::: is a digital currency created in 2009. It follows the ideas set out in a white paper by the mysterious Satoshi Nakamoto, whose true identity has yet to be verified. Bitcoin offers the promise of lower transaction fees than traditional online payment mechanisms and is operated by a decentralized authority, unlike government-issued currencies. There are no physical bitcoins, only balances kept on a public ledger in the cloud, that – along with all Bitcoin transactions – is verified by a massive amount of computing power. Bitcoins are not issued or backed by any banks or governments, nor are individual bitcoins valuable as a commodity. Despite its not being legal tender, Bitcoin charts high on popularity, and has triggered the launch of other virtual currencies collectively referred to as Altcoins.
:::A digital_currency::: is a form of currency that is available only in digital or electronic form, and not in physical form. It is also called digital money, electronic money, electronic currency, or cyber cash.
Virtual_currency:: is a type of digital currency that is only available in electronic form and not in physical form. It is stored and transacted in only through designated software, mobile or computer applications, or through dedicated digital wallets, and the transactions occur over the Internet or over secure dedicated networks. Virtual currency is considered to be a subset of the digital currency group, which also includes cryptocurrencies.
:::Closed_Virtual_Currency::: An unregulated digital currency that is used as payment only within certain virtual communities. A Closed Virtual Currency has no connection to the real economy and cannot be converted to legal tender. Think of closed virtual currency as closed loop payment cards like the Nordstrom store credit card that can only be used in Nordstrom.
:::A blockchain::: is a digitized, decentralized, public ledger of all cryptocurrency transactions. Constantly growing as ‘completed’ blocks (the most recent transactions) are recorded and added to it in chronological order, it allows market participants to keep track of digital currency transactions without central recordkeeping. Each node (a computer connected to the network) gets a copy of the blockchain, which is downloaded automatically.
:::Fiat_money::: is currency that a government has declared to be legal tender, but it is not backed by a physical commodity. The value of fiat money is derived from the relationship between supply and demand rather than the value of the material from which the money is made.
:::A cryptocurrency::: is a digital or virtual currency that uses cryptography for security. A cryptocurrency is difficult to counterfeit because of this security feature. A defining feature of a cryptocurrency, and arguably its most endearing allure, is its organic nature; it is not issued by any central authority, rendering it theoretically immune to government interference or manipulation.
:::Initial_Coin_Offering::: (ICO::: An unregulated means by which funds are raised for a new cryptocurrency venture. An Initial Coin Offering (ICO) is used by startups to bypass the rigorous and regulated capital-raising process required by venture capitalists or banks. In an ICO campaign, a percentage of the cryptocurrency is sold to early backers of the project in exchange for legal tender or other cryptocurrencies, but usually for Bitcoin. Also called an Initial Public Coin Offering (IPCO).
:::Double_Spending::: The risk that a digital currency can be spent twice. Double-spending is a potential problem unique to digital currencies because digital information can be reproduced relatively easily. Physical currencies do not have this issue because they cannot be easily replicated, and the parties involved in a transaction can immediately verify the bona fides of the physical currency. With digital currency, there is a risk that the holder could make a copy of the digital token and send it to a merchant or another party while retaining the original. This was a concern initially with Bitcoin, the most popular digital currency or "cryptocurrency," since it is a decentralized currency with no central agency to verify that it is spent only once. However, Bitcoin has a mechanism based on transaction logs to verify the authenticity of each transaction and prevent double-counting.
:::In the legal code of the United States, a money_transmitter::: or money transfer service is a business entity that provides money transfer services or payment instruments. Money Transmitters in the US are part of a larger group of entities called money service businesses or MSBs. ~ Wikipedia
:::Predictive_Market::: A speculative_market::: that is based on speculations regarding events, such as who will win an election or whether a sports player will be resigned to a team. All of the "trades" involve a prediction with an unambiguous outcome. 
A :::market::: is a medium that allows buyers and sellers of a specific good or service to interact in order to facilitate an exchange. This type of market may either be a physical marketplace where people come together to exchange goods and services in person, as in a bazaar or shopping center, or a virtual market wherein buyers and sellers do not interact, as in an online market. Market can also refer to the general market where securities are traded. This form of the term may also refer to specific securities markets and may take place in person or online. The term "market" can also refer to people with the desire and ability to buy a specific product or service.
:::The_market_price::: is the current price at which an asset or service can be bought or sold. The economic theory contends that the market price converges at a point where the forces of supply and demand meet. Shocks to either the supply side or demand side can cause the market price for a good or service to be re-evaluated.
:::The_current_price::: is the actual selling price of a security trading on an exchange, as well as the most recent price of a security listed in an investment portfolio. In the case of a bond, a bond's current price will often be quoted as 10% of the par value of $1000. A bond that currently trades at $99 is really priced at $990. Current price also refers to the present price of a stock, currency, commodity, stamps or a precious metal.
:::Chasing_the_market::: refers to entering or exiting an investment with the intention of profiting from an occurring development or trend. The evolution of efficient market theory suggests that the financial markets are extremely efficient with new factors influencing price often integrated into valuations in real time. This is typically evident in the market’s continuous trading, often making chase-the-market strategies futile.
:::A run:::, in technical analysis, is a series of consecutive price movements that occur in the same direction for a particular security, sector, or index. A run is constituted by a prolonged uptrend or downtrend, characterized by repeated daily gains or losses. For example, if a stock’s price increased each day for five trading sessions, it would be said to be in a bull run, which may also be referred to as a rally. A bear run would consist of consecutive down days. Runs that appear in certain sequences, such as a bear run followed immediately by a bull run, are often used with charting strategies as signals to identify technical levels for entry or exit from a trade. When looking at a run, traders should consider the underlying volume behind the move as an indicator of the strength of the run. Traders may also want to consider other factors surrounding the move, including other technical indicators and chart patterns.
:::A bull_market::: is a financial market of a group of securities in which prices are rising or are expected to rise. The term "bull market" is most often used to refer to the stock market but can be applied to anything that is traded, such as bonds, currencies and commodities.
:::A bear_market::: is a condition in which securities prices fall and widespread pessimism causes the stock market's downward spiral to be self-sustaining. Investors anticipate losses as pessimism and selling increases. Although figures vary, a downturn of 20 percent or more from a peak in multiple broad market indexes, such as the Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) or Standard & Poor's 500 Index (S&P 500), over a two-month period is considered an entry into a bear market.
:::A bull_trap::: is a false signal indicating that a declining trend in a stock or index has reversed and is heading upwards when, in fact, the security will continue to decline. The move "traps" traders or investors that acted on the buy signal and generates losses on resulting long positions. A bull trap may also be referred to as a whipsaw pattern.
:::A Bear_Trap::: is a technical pattern that occurs when the performance of a stock or an index incorrectly signals a reversal of a rising price trend.
:::The_poverty_trap::: is a mechanism, which makes it very difficult for people to escape poverty. A poverty trap is created when an economic system requires a significant amount of various forms of capital in order to earn enough to escape poverty. When individuals lack this capital, they may also find it difficult to acquire it, creating a self-reinforcing cycle of poverty.
Sucker_Rally describes an inaccurate indication that a price is heading upward despite a longer downward trend, often during a bear market.
:::A rate_of_return::: is the gain or loss on an investment over a specified time period, expressed as a percentage of the investment’s cost. Gains on investments are defined as income received plus any capital gains realized on the sale of the investment. The formula for rate of return is: [(Current price - Original price) / Original price] x 100
:::A lemming::: refers to the act of an investor following the crowd into an investment, without doing research themselves; this usually results in losses. These investors are emotional and easily swayed by short-term market performance. This "herd" mentality can increase the chance of losing money, because investors either leave the market too early or get into it too late, when prices are already too high to make a profit. n the animal kingdom, a lemming is a rodent known for periodic mass migrations that occasionally end in drowning. To contradict the "herd" mentality, many proactive investors react in an opposite fashion than what the majority of investors are doing. For example, if investors are in a buying frenzy, anti-"herd" investors will sell and when the crowd sells, these investors will go against the lemmings by buying stocks, instead. The antidote to becoming a lemming investor is to keep emotions separate from trading judgment. Instead, concentrate on spotting lemming activity and consider exploiting it for gain by moving in a contrarian fashion. Here's why this is a better strategy that succumbing to the lemming mentality: extreme optimism often coincides with market tops. People think the sky's the limit and send stock prices flying. However, savvier investors know that the time to sell is when prices are high. Likewise, extreme pessimism can be bullish for a contrarian investor. Toward the end of a big decline, the last bulls throw in the towel and sell with a vengeance. Cooler heads in such situations can see the fire sale happening and buy.  Studies have found that investors are most influenced by current events – market news, political events, earnings, etc. – and ignore long-term investment and economic fundamentals. Furthermore, if a movement starts in one direction, it tends to pick up more and more investors with time and momentum. The impact of such lemming-like behavior has been made worse in recent years because of more quantity of more sensationalist financial, economic, and other news than ever before. This proliferation of financial media inevitable affects investor psychology.
:::A bear_squeeze::: is a change in market conditions which forces traders, attempting to profit from price declines, to buy back underlying assets at a higher price than they sold for when entering the trade. A bear squeeze can be an intentional event created by central banks or market makers. Other names for this condition include bear trap and short squeeze. 
:::A stock_cycle::: is the evolution of a stock's price from an early uptrend to price high through to a downtrend and price low. Richard Wyckoff, a prominent trader and pioneer in technical analysis, developed a buy-and-sell stock cycle that occurs over four stages: 1. Accumulation 2. Markup 3. Distribution 4. Markdown
:::HODL::: is a term derived from a misspelling of "hold" that refers to buy-and-hold strategies in the context of bitcoin and other cryptocurrencies.
:::Price_rigging::: is an illegal action that occurs when parties conspire to fix or inflate prices to achieve higher profits at the expense of the consumer. Also known as "price fixing" or "collusion," price rigging can be found in any industry. Cases of price rigging may be prosecuted under the antitrust laws of several different countries, as it runs contrary to natural market forces (such as supply and demand). It has the effect of dampening competition, which tends to favor the consumer with greater variety and lower prices. Price rigging is a form of market manipulation. As a term, "price rigging" is most commonly used in British English, while "price fixing" is more common in North America.
:::Bid_rigging::: is an illegal practice in which competing parties collude to choose the winner of a bidding process while others submit uncompetitive bids. Bid rigging stifles free-market competition, as the rigged price will be higher that what might have resulted from a competitive bidding process. As such, bid rigging is harmful to consumers and taxpayers who bear the cost of higher prices and procurement costs. The Sherman Antitrust Act of 1890 makes bid rigging illegal under U.S. antitrust law. Bid rigging is a felony in the U.S. punishable by fines, imprisonment, or both. It is also illegal in a majority of countries as a form of market manipulation.
:::A head_and_shoulders_pattern::: is a chart formation that resembles a baseline with three peaks, the outside two are close in height and the middle is highest. In technical analysis, a head and shoulders pattern describes a specific chart formation that predicts a bullish-to-bearish trend reversal. The head and shoulders pattern is believed to be one of the most reliable trend reversal patterns. It is one of several top patterns that signal, with varying degrees of accuracy, that an upward trend is nearing its end.
:::A down-and-out_option::: is a type of knock-out barrier option that ceases to exist when the price of the underlying security falls to a specific price level, called the barrier price. If the price of the underlying does not drop to the barrier level, the option acts like any other option, giving the holder the right but not the obligation to exercise their call or put option at the strike price on or before the expiration date specified in the contract.
:::Double-Up::: An investing strategy "doubles up" when a trader doubles his or her current position in an asset, generally after an adverse price movement event. By doubling the risk, the trader hopes to earn a larger return when the security moves in a favorable direction.
:::A double_bottom_pattern::: is a technical analysis charting pattern that describes a change in trend and a momentum reversal from prior leading price action. It describes the drop of a stock or index, a rebound, another drop to the same or similar level as the original drop, and finally another rebound. The double bottom looks like the letter "W". The twice-touched low is considered a support level.
:::Double_top::: and Double_bottom_patterns::: are chart patterns that occur when the underlying investment moves in a similar pattern to the letter "W" (double bottom) or "M" (double top). Double top and bottom analysis is used in technical analysis to explain movements in a security or other investment, and can be used as part of a trading strategy to exploit recurring patterns.
:::Double_Hedging::: is a trading strategy in which an investor hedges a cash market position using both a futures position and an options position.
:::A trading_strategy::: is method of buying and selling in markets that is based on predefined rules used to make trading decisions. A trading strategy includes a well-considered investing and trading plan that specifies investing objectives, risk tolerance, time horizon and tax implications. Ideas and best practices need to be researched and adopted then adhered to. Planning for trading includes developing methods that include buying or selling stocks, bonds, ETFs or other investments and may extend to more complex trades such as options or futures. Placing trades means working with a broker or broker dealer and identifying and managing trading costs including spreads, commissions and fees. Once executed, trading positions are monitored and managed, including adjusting or closing them as needed. Risk and return are measured as well as portfolio impacts of trades. The longer term tax results of trading are a major factor and may encompass capital gains or tax-loss harvesting strategies to offset gains with losses.
:::Buy_and_hold::: is a passive investment strategy for which an investor buys stocks and holds them for a long period regardless of fluctuations in the market. An investor who employs a buy-and-hold strategy actively selects stocks but is not concerned with short-term price movements and technical indicators.
:::Zero-cost_strategy::: refers to a trading or business decision that does not entail any expense to execute. A zero-cost strategy costs a business or individual nothing while at the same time improves operations, makes processes more efficient, or serves to reduce future expenses. As a practice, a zero-cost strategy may be applied in a number of contexts to improve the performance of an asset.
:::Formula_investing::: is a method of investing that rigidly follows a prescribed theory or formula to determine investment policy. Formula investing can be related to how an investor handles asset allocation, invests in funds or securities, or decides when and how much money to invest.
:::An investment_strategy::: guides an investor's actions with respect to asset allocation. Strategies vary, but they are based on individual goals, risk tolerance and future needs for capital. Some investment strategies seek rapid growth where an investor focuses on capital appreciation, or they can follow a low-risk strategy where the focus is on wealth protection. Many investors buy low-cost, diversified index funds, use dollar-cost averaging and reinvest dividends. Dollar-cost averaging is an investment strategy where a fixed dollar amount of stocks or a particular investment are acquired on a regular schedule regardless of the cost or share price. The investor purchases more shares when prices are low and fewer shares when prices are high. Over time, some investments will do better than others, and the return averages out over time.
:::A vanilla_strategy::: is a common or popular approach to investing or decision making in business. Although the concept is relatively basic, some investors and businesses excel because they stick with an ordinary, "vanilla" strategy, while others succeed through innovation. For example, in derivatives trading, a vanilla strategy is the use of two different plain vanilla instruments, such as swaps, at the same time.
:::A Halloween_strategy::: is an investment technique in which an investor sells stocks before May 1 and refrains from reinvesting in the stock market until October 31, in order to increase capital gains. The Halloween strategy is based on the premise that most capital gains are made between October 31 (Halloween) and May 1, and that the other six months of the year should be spent investing in other investment types or not at all.
:::A day_trader::: executes short and long trades to capitalize on intraday market price action resulting from temporary supply and demand inefficiencies. A day trader often closes all trades before the end of the trading day, so not to hold open positions overnight. Day traders' effectiveness may be limited by the bid-ask spread, trading commissions, as well as expenses for real-time news feeds and analytics software. Successful day trading requires extensive knowledge and experience. Day traders employ a variety of methods to make trading decisions. Some traders employ computer trading models that use technical analysis to calculate favorable probabilities, while some trade on their instinct. A day trader is more concerned with price action characteristics of a stock itself, unlike investors who use fundamental data to analyze the long-term growth potential of a company to decide whether to buy, sell or hold its stock. Price volatility and average day range are critical to a day trader. A security must have sufficient price movement for a day trader to achieve a profit. Volume and liquidity are also crucial because entering and exiting trades quickly is vital to capturing small profits per trade. Securities with a small daily range or light daily volume would not be of interest to a day trader.
:::A pattern_day_trader::: is a regulatory designation for traders or investors that execute four or more day trades during five business days’ time. A pattern day trader is a day trader who purchases and sells the same security on the same day in a margin account. Pattern day traders must also have more than six percent of those trades occur in the same margin account for the same period to be considered separate from a standard day trader. These securities can include stock options and short sales, as long as they are occurring on the same day.
:::Trading_psychology::: refers to the emotions and mental state that help to dictate success or failure in trading securities. Trading psychology represents various aspects of an individual’s character and behaviors that influence their trading actions. Trading psychology can be as important as other attributes such as knowledge, experience and skill in determining trading success. Discipline and risk-taking are two of the most critical aspects of trading psychology, since a trader’s implementation of these aspects is critical to the success of his or her trading plan. While fear and greed are the two most commonly known emotions associated with trading psychology, other emotions that drive trading behavior are hope and regret.
:::A capital_loss::: is the loss incurred when a capital asset, such as an investment or real estate, decreases in value. This loss is not realized until the asset is sold for a price that is lower than the original purchase price. A capital loss is essentially the difference between the purchase price and the price at which the asset is sold, where the sale price is lower than the purchase price. For example, if an investor bought a house for $250,000 and sold the house five years later for $200,000, the investor realizes a capital loss of $50,000.
:::Iceberg_orders::: are large single orders that have been divided into smaller limit orders, usually through the use of an automated program, for the purpose of hiding the actual order quantity. The term "iceberg" comes from the fact that the visible lots are just the "tip of the iceberg" given the greater number of limit orders ready to be placed.

:::Market_timing::: is the act of moving in and out of the market or switching between asset classes based on using predictive methods such as technical indicators or economic data. Because it is extremely difficult to predict the future direction of the stock market, investors who try to time the market, especially mutual fund investors, tend to underperform investors who remain invested.
:::Timing_risk::: is the speculation that an investor enters into when trying to buy or sell a stock based on future price predictions. Timing risk explains the potential for missing out on beneficial movements in price due to an error in timing. This could cause harm to the value of an investor's portfolio resulting from purchasing too high or selling too low.
:::Overstay::: refers to the act of holding an investment for too long. It often occurs when traders attempt to time the market by identifying the end of a price trend and the beginning of a new one, but, due to greed, fear or overconfidence, tend to overstay their positions. This usually results in reduced gains or, worse, further losses.
:::Peter_Lynch::: is one of the most successful and well-known investors of all time. Lynch is the legendary former manager of the Magellan Fund at the major investment brokerage Fidelity. He took over the fund in 1977 at age 33. He ran it for 13 years, and his success allowed him to retire in 1990 at 46. His investment style has been described as adaptive to the prevailing economic environment at the time, but Lynch always stressed that you should be able to understand what you own.
:::Trailing::: is a term often attached to a return, ratio or risk measure to describe the time that a particular set of data is referring to. It refers to the most recently completed time period of specified length, such as 3-year or 12-month. Trailing can also be to describe a past statistic, such as same-store sales, but can also be used to describe a technique, such as a trailing stop order. It is most commonly used as "trailing 3-year,&quot "trailing 12 months," "trailing three months" or "trailing six months."
:::A trailing_stop::: is a stop order that can be set at a defined percentage away from a security's current market price. An investor places a trailing stop for a long position below the security’s current market price; for a short position, they set it above the current price. A trailing stop is designed to protect gains by enabling a trade to remain open and continue to profit as long as the price is moving in the investor’s favor, but closes the trade if the price changes direction by a specified percentage. A trailing stop can also specify a dollar amount instead of a percentage. 
:::Trailing_price-to-earnings::: (P/E:::) is a relative valuation multiple that is based on the last 12 months of actual earnings. It is calculated by taking the current stock price and dividing it by the trailing earnings per share (EPS) for the past 12 months. Trailing P/E Ratio = Current Share Price / Trailing 12-Month EPS
A buy_stop order instructs a broker to purchase a security when it hits a strike price that is higher than the current spot price. Once the price hits that strike, the buy stop becomes a market order, fillable at the next available price. This type of order can apply to stocks, derivatives, forex or a variety of other tradable instruments. The buy stop order can serve a variety of purposes with the underlying assumption that a share price that climbs to a certain height will continue to rise.
:::Rule_of_18::: is an informal rule of thumb that can allegedly reveal whether the next move for the stock market is up or down. It can be calculated by adding the inflation rate to the price-to-earnings ratio (P/E) of the Dow Jones Industrial Average. If the total is above 18, stocks are supposed to decrease. If the total is under 18, stocks are expected to increase.
:::Valuation::: is the process of determining the current worth of an asset or a company. There are many techniques used for doing a valuation. An analyst placing a value on a company looks at the business's management, the composition of its capital structure, the prospect of future earnings, and the market value of its assets. A valuation can be useful when trying to determine the fair value of a security, which is determined by what a buyer is willing to pay a seller, assuming both parties enter the transaction willingly. When a security trades on an exchange, buyers and sellers determine the market value of a stock or bond. The concept of intrinsic value, however, refers to the perceived value of a security based on future earnings or some other company attribute unrelated to the market price of a security. That's where valuation comes into play. Analysts do a valuation to determine whether a company or asset is over- or undervalued by the market.
:::Valuation_analysis::: is a process to estimate the approximate value or worth of an asset, whether a business, equity or fixed income security, commodity, real estate or other asset. The analyst may use different approaches to valuation analysis for different types of assets, but the common thread will be looking at the underlying fundamentals of the asset.
:::Asset_valuation::: is the process of determining the fair market or present value of assets, using book values, absolute valuation models like discounted cash flow analysis, option pricing models or comparables. Such assets include investments in marketable securities such as stocks, bonds and options; tangible assets like buildings and equipment; or intangible assets such as brands, patents and trademarks.
:::The_valuation_period::: is the time period at the end of a given period of time during which value is determined for variable investment options. Valuation is the calculation of a product’s value and is typically done by appraisers at the end of each business day.
Zone_of_support::: refers to a price zone reached when a security’s price has fallen to a predicted low, known as a support level. A zone of support is typically identified from technical analysis charting. The zone of support is seen as a lower boundary which the stock has not broken through in previous trading sessions. At the support level, supply outweighs demand and volume is usually low.
:::Cost_of_acquisition::: is a term used across business and accounting to describe the total costs incurred when signing a new client, purchasing and installing a new asset or acquiring a new item for the business.
:::Cost_of_acquisition::: can be a business sales term referring to the expense required to attain a customer or a sale. In setting a marketing and sales strategy, a company must decide what the maximum cost of acquisition will be, which effectively determines the highest amount the company is willing to spend to attain each customer.
:::The_cost_of_equity::: is the return a company requires to decide if an investment meets capital return requirements. It is often used as a capital budgeting threshold for required rate of return. A firm's cost of equity represents the compensation the market demands in exchange for owning the asset and bearing the risk of ownership. The traditional formulas for cost of equity (COE) are the dividend capitalization model and the capital asset pricing model.
:::The_cost_of_carry::: refers to costs incurred as a result of an investment position. These costs can include financial costs, such as the interest costs on bonds, interest expenses on margin accounts, and interest on loans used to purchase a security. They can also include economic costs, such as the opportunity costs associated with taking the initial position.
:::Fakeout::: is a term used in technical analysis to refer to a situation in which a trader enters into a position in anticipation of a future transaction signal or price movement, but the signal or movement never develops and the asset moves in the opposite direction.
Generally, :::equity::: is the value of an asset less the amount of all liabilities on that asset. As an accounting equation, one can represent it as Assets - Liabilities = Equity. Equity can have somewhat different meanings, depending on the context and the asset type. In finance, you can think of equity as one’s degree ownership in any asset after subtracting all debts associated with that asset. For example, a car or house with no outstanding debt is entirely the owner's equity because he or she can readily sell the item for cash and pocket the resulting sum. Stocks are equity because they represent ownership in a firm, even though ownership of shares in a public company rarely come with accompanying liabilities.
A :::liability::: is defined as a company's legal financial debts or obligations that arise during the course of business operations. Liabilities are settled over time through the transfer of economic benefits including money, goods or services. Recorded on the right side of the balance sheet, liabilities include loans, accounts payable, mortgages, deferred revenues and accrued expenses.
:::Accumulation/Distribution::: An indicator that tracks the relationship between volume and price. It is often considered a leading indicator because it shows when a stock is being accumulated or distributed, foreshadowing major price moves. When the Accumulation/Distribution line is moving in the same direction as the price trend, it confirms the trend. When the Accumulation/Distribution line is moving in the opposite direction of the price trend, it indicates the price trend may not be sustainable. The indicator has a three step calculation:   1. Money Flow Multiplier = [(close  -  low) - (high - close)] /(high - low)    2. Money Flow Volume = Money Flow Multiplier x volume for the period    3. Accumulation/Distribution= previous Accumulation/Distribution + current period's Money Flow Volume
A :::market_maker::: is a "market participant" or member firm of an exchange that also buys and sells securities at prices it displays in an exchange’s trading system for its own account which are called principal trades and for customer accounts which are called agency trades. Using these systems, a market maker can enter and adjust quotes to buy or sell, enter, and execute orders, and clear those orders. Market makers exist under rules created by stock exchanges approved by a securities regulator. In the U.S., the Securities and Exchange Commission is the main regulator of the exchanges. Market maker rights and responsibilities vary by exchange, and the market within an exchange such as equities or options.
:::Transaction_costs::: are expenses incurred when buying or selling a good or service. Transaction costs represent the labor required to bring a good or service to market, giving rise to entire industries dedicated to facilitating exchanges. In a financial sense, transaction costs include brokers' commissions and spreads, which are the differences between the price the dealer paid for a security and the price the buyer pays.
:::Principal::: is a term that has several financial meanings. The most commonly used refers to the original sum of money borrowed in a loan, or put into an investment. Similar to the former, it can also refer to the face value of a bond. Principal can also refer to an individual party or parties, the owner of a private company or the chief participant in a transaction.
:::The_acceleration_principle::: is an economic concept that draws a connection between the rate of change of consumption and capital investment. According to the acceleration principle, if demand for consumer goods increases, then the percentage change in the demand for machines and other investment necessary to make these goods will increase even more. In other words, if income and therefore consumption increases, there will be a corresponding but magnified change in investment. It is important to note that this principle does not compute the rate of change in capital investment as a product of the overall level of consumption, but as a product of the rate of change in the level of consumption. The acceleration principle is also referred to as the accelerator principle.
:::Measuring_Principle::: In techincal analysis, An intangible principle for finding mininum security price targets for traders. The measuring principle uses technical analysis to analyze chart patterns to detect stock levels that, if broken, could lead to a small down leg. More specifically, it allows traders to set a reasonable minimum price target on a stock by weighing the movements of the stock chart pattern against each other. 
:::The_Pareto_Principle:::, named after economist Vilfredo Pareto, specifies that 80 percent of consequences come from 20 percent of the causes, or an unequal relationship between inputs and outputs. This principle serves as a general reminder that the relationship between inputs and outputs is not balanced. The Pareto Principle is also known as the Pareto Rule or the 80/20 Rule. 
:::The_fifty_percent_principle::: is a technical correction that gives back 50 to 67 percent of the most recent stock price gains before the price begins advancing again. If a stock recently gained 30 percent, the fifty percent principle holds that it will give back at least half of that gain before testing new highs.
:::The_80-20_rule::: is a business rule of thumb that states that 80% of outcomes can be attributed to 20% of all causes for a given event. In business, the 80-20 rule is often used to point out that 80% of a company's revenue is generated by 20% of its total customers. Therefore, the rule is used to help managers identify and determine which operating factors are most important and should receive the most attention based on an efficient use of resources.
Launched in 2015, :::Ethereum::: is a decentralized software platform that enables SmartContracts and Distributed Applications (ĐApps) to be built and run without any downtime, fraud, control or interference from a third party. The platform is also the basis for its own virtual currency, Ether. Ethereum is not just a platform but also a programming language (Turing complete) running on a blockchain, helping developers to build and publish distributed applications. The potential applications of Ethereum are wide ranging.
Launched in the year 2011, :::Litecoin::: is an alternative cryptocurrency based on the model of Bitcoin. Litecoin was created by an MIT graduate and former Google engineer named Charlie Lee. Litecoin is based on an open source global payment network that is not controlled by any central authority. Litecoin differs from Bitcoins in aspects like faster block generation rate and use of scrypt as a proof of work scheme.
:::Bitcoin_Classic::: A fork from Bitcoin Core that proposed increasing the size of blocks. Despite early successes, Bitcoin Classic failed to be adopted by the wider bitcoin community.
:::51%_attack::: refers to an attack on a blockchain – usually bitcoin's, for which such an attack is still hypothetical – by a group of miners controlling more than 50% of the network's mining hashrate, or computing power. The attackers would be able to prevent new transactions from gaining confirmations, allowing them to halt payments between some or all users. They would also be able to reverse transactions that were completed while they were in control of the network, meaning they could double-spend coins.
:::Satoshi_Cycle::: is a crypto theory that denotes to a high correlation between the price of Bitcoin and internet search for Bitcoin. The term was coined by Bitcoin expert Christopher Burniske on August 2017 when Bitcoin hit a record high. The name derives from the as-of-yet unidentified creator of Bitcoin, Satoshi Nakamoto.
:::Market_Cycle::: A cycle is a wide term referring to trends or patterns that emerge during different market or business environments. During a cycle, some securities or asset classes tend to outperform others because their business models aligned with conditions for growth. More specifically, market cycles are the period between the two latest highs or lows of a common benchmark, such as the S&P 500 which highlights the net performance of a fund through both an up and a down market. A market cycle is complete when the S&P 500 is 15% below the highest point or 15% above the lowest point (ending a down market).
:::Trade::: is a basic economic concept involving the buying and selling of goods and services, with compensation paid by a buyer to a seller, or the exchange of goods or services between parties. The most common medium of exchange for these transactions is money, but trade may also be executed with the exchange of goods or services between both parties, referred to as a barter, or payment with virtual currency, the most popular of which is bitcoin. In financial markets, trading refers to the buying and selling of securities, such as the purchase of stock on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE).
A :::medium_of_exchange::: is an intermediary instrument used to facilitate the sale, purchase or trade of goods between parties. For an instrument to function as a medium of exchange, it must represent a standard of value accepted by all parties. In modern economies, the medium of exchange is currency.
:::Economics::: is a social science concerned with the production, distribution and consumption of goods and services. It studies how individuals, businesses, governments and nations make choices on allocating resources to satisfy their wants and needs, and tries to determine how these groups should organize and coordinate efforts to achieve maximum output. Economic analysis often progresses through deductive processes, much like mathematical logic, where the implications of specific human activities are considered in a "means-ends" framework. Economics can generally be broken down into macroeconomics, which concentrates on the behavior of the aggregate economy, and microeconomics, which focuses on individual consumers.
:::Macroeconomics::: is a branch of the economics that studies how the aggregate economy behaves. In macroeconomics, a variety of economy-wide phenomena is thoroughly examined such as inflation, price levels, rate of growth, national income, gross domestic product (GDP) and changes in unemployment.
:::Microeconomics::: is the social science that studies the implications of individual human action, specifically about how those decisions affect the utilization and distribution of scarce resources. Microeconomics shows how and why different goods have different values, how individuals make more efficient or more productive decisions, and how individuals best coordinate and cooperate with one another. Generally speaking, microeconomics is considered a more complete, advanced and settled science than macroeconomics.
:::Economic_growth::: is an increase in the capacity of an economy to produce goods and services, compared from one period of time to another. It can be measured in nominal or real terms, the latter of which is adjusted for inflation. Traditionally, aggregate economic growth is measured in terms of gross national product (GNP) or gross domestic product (GDP), although alternative metrics are sometimes used.
:::Economic_conditions::: refer to the present state of the economy in a country or region. The conditions change over time along with the economic and business cycles, as an economy goes through expansion and contraction. Economic conditions are considered to be sound or positive when an economy is expanding and are seen as adverse or negative when an economy is contracting.
:::Indicators::: are statistics used to measure current conditions as well as to forecast financial or economic trends. Indicators can be broadly categorized into economic indicators and technical indicators. Economic indicators are statistical metrics used to measure the growth or contraction of the economy as a whole or sectors within the economy. In fundamental analysis, economic indicators that quantify current economic and industry conditions are used to provide insight into the future profitability potential of public companies. Technical indicators are used extensively in technical analysis to predict changes in stock trends or price patterns in any traded asset.
An :::economic_indicator::: is a piece of economic data, usually of macroeconomic scale, that is used by analysts to interpret current or future investment possibilities or to judge the overall health of an economy. Economic indicators can be anything the investor chooses, but specific pieces of data released by government and non-profit organizations have become widely followed. Such indicators include but aren't limited to: the consumer price index (CPI), gross domestic product (GDP), unemployment figures and the price of crude oil. 
:::Economic_man::: refers to an idealized human being who acts rationally and with complete knowledge, who seeks to maximize personal utility or satisfaction. Economic man is an assumption of many economic models, and is also known as homo economicus. To explain a phenomenon, scientists often build models, and to build a model, scientists have to make assumptions that simplify reality. In economics, one of those simplifying assumptions is economic man. Unlike a real human, economic man always behaves rationally in a narrowly self-interested way that maximizes his or her satisfaction. This assumption enables economists to study how markets would work if populated by these theoretical persons. For example, it is often assumed that demand for a product is a linear function of price. While this may sometimes be the case with certain goods, it is not reflective of the actual consumer environment. Economists are aware of the deficiencies of using economic man, though some are more willing to abandon the concept than others. One obvious problem is that human beings don't always act "rationally," that is, in their narrow economic self-interest. The economic man concept also assumes that the options faced by economic man offer obvious differences in satisfaction. But it is not always clear that one option is superior to another. Two options may enhance a person's utility, or satisfaction, in two different ways, and it may not be clear that one is better than the other.
:::Financial_economics::: is a branch of economics that analyzes the use and distribution of resources in markets in which decisions are made under uncertainty. Financial decisions must often take into account future events, whether those be related to individual stocks, portfolios or the market as a whole.
:::Mainstream_economics::: is a term used to describe schools of economic thought considered to be orthodox. Many of the underlying categories within and concepts central to mainstream economics are readily taught at universities. Many of the underpinning models and beliefs are based on concepts that involve economic scarcity, the role of governmental regulation or other action in effecting an actor's decision, the concept of utility and the idea that people are purely rational actors who will make decisions that are based purely on available information and not emotion.
:::Social_economics::: is a branch of economics that focuses on the relationship between social behavior and economics. It examines how social norms, ethics and other social philosophies influence consumer behavior and shape an economy, and uses history, politics and other social sciences to predict potential results from changes to society or the economy.   Social economic theories do not move in lockstep with those of orthodox schools of economics. Therefore, traditional schools of thought often assume that actors are self-interested and make rational decisions. Social economic theories often consider subject matter outside the focus of mainstream economics including the effect of the environment and ecology on consumption and wealth.
A :::hanging_man::: is a candlestick shape that often appears at the end of an uptrend. It has a short real body, little or no upper wick and a long lower wick. A hanging man represents a large sell-off early in the trading day, which sends the price plunging, before buyers push the price back to somewhere near the opening price. Investors often read a hanging man as a sign that the bulls are beginning to lose control and that the asset may soon enter a downtrend.   A hanging man also be part of a continuation of the bullish trend. In that case, the hanging man tells the story of a large number of bears dumping their stock too early and short-sellers picking the wrong time to short.   Intraday charts, popular among day traders, show more hanging men than daily charts do. Day traders pay more attention to hanging men than other investors do.
:::Augmented_reality::: is an enhanced version of the real physical world through the use of visual elements, sound or other sensory stimuli. It is a growing trend among companies involved in mobile computing and business applications in particular. Amid the rise of data collection and analysis, one of augmented reality’s primary goals is to highlight specific features of the physical world, increase understanding of those features and derive smart and accessible insight that can be applied to real-world applications. Such big data can help inform companies' decision-making and gain insight into consumer spending habits, among others. 
:::Second_Life_Economy::: A vibrant marketplace where virtual goods and services are bought and sold in a three-dimensional gaming world called Second Life. The Second Life Economy simulates a free market economy where players can buy and sell virtual goods with virtual or real money. 
:::Basing::: refers to a period in which a stock or other traded security is showing minimal upward or downward movement. The resulting price pattern looks like a flat line or slightly rounded. Often, 'basing' is a term used by technical analysts to describe an issue that is consolidating after a period of rapid growth or decline. A stock that is basing has equal amounts of supply and demand. Basing is a common occurrence after a stock or the market has been in a lengthy decline or had a significant advance. In other words, the market is taking a break. Some stocks can form a base that lasts for several years before the trend reverses. Basing periods are accompanied by declining volume as prices consolidate. Volatility also contracts as a stock trades sideways. (For more, see: How Do I Identify a Stock That is Under Consolidation?) Stocks that are basing establish clear support and resistance levels as the bulls and bears fight for control. Institutional traders may use a basing period to accumulate a large order they are buying for a customer. Many technical analysts believe that basing is crucial, especially for stocks that have had a rapid advance. They view basing as the "breather" that allows the issue to continue climbing. https://www.investopedia.com/terms/b/basing.asp
:::Financial_porn::: is a slang term used to describe sensationalist reports of financial news and products causing irrational buying that can be detrimental to investors' financial health. Short-term focus by the media on a financial topic can create excitement that does little to help investors make smart, long-term financial decisions, and in many cases clouds investors' decision-making ability. Expanded media coverage, specifically the advent of 24-hour cable news networks and the internet and the tools it has provided the financial industry, has led to a large increase in financial porn.    Examples of financial porn include constant advertisements of easy-to-use trading-strategy products that purport to turn minimal investments into small fortunes, media coverage of the latest and greatest sector trends and magazines with front pages that claim to have the next 10-must-own mutual funds of next year. Many of these products and ideas expose investors to great risks posed by both the movement of the market and the risk of fraud.
:::A_forex_trading_robot::: is a computer program based on a set of forex trading signals that helps determine whether to buy or sell a currency pair at a given point in time. Forex​ robots are designed to remove the psychological element of trading, which can be detrimental. While trading systems can be purchased online, traders should exercise caution when buying them this way. Forex trading robots are automated software programs that generate trading signals. Most of these robots are built with MetaTrader, using the MQL scripting language, which lets traders generate trading signals or place orders and manage trades.    Automated forex trading robots are available for purchase over the Internet, but traders should exercise caution when buying any such trading system. Often times, companies will spring up overnight to sell trading systems with a money back guarantee before disappearing a few weeks later. These companies may cherry-pick their successful trades or use curve fitting to generate great results when backtesting a system, but are not legitimate systems for assessing risk and opportunity. There is no such thing as a “holy grail” for trading systems, because if someone did develop a money making system that was fail proof, they would not want to share it with the general public. This is why institutional investors and hedge funds keep their “black box” trading programs under lock and key. --- Developing Your Own Forex Trading Robot https://www.investopedia.com/terms/forex/f/forex-trading-robot.asp
:::Automated_forex_trading::: is a system of trading foreign currencies with a computer program based on a set of analyses that help determine whether to buy or sell a currency pair at a given time. Automated forex trading uses a computer program that the trader “teaches” to make decisions based on a set of technical rules. The signal generates an actual buy or sell order that is executed. oreign exchange (forex) trading has become incredibly popular in recent years thanks to the ubiquity of online trading platforms and the 24-hour nature of the market. While many institutional investors rely on algorithmic trading, retail traders have only recently been able to harness the power of automated forex trading systems.    MetaTrader, TradeStation and other applications have made it easy to write simple computer programs based on technical analysis rules. Advanced traders may also create their own trading systems in programming languages like Python or R.    For example, a trader may write a program that places a buy order for a currency pair when the 50-day moving average crosses above the 200-day moving average and places a sell order when the pair moves 50 pips higher. Many forex brokers let traders automatically run these programs to execute trades. https://www.investopedia.com/terms/forex/a/automated-forex-trading.asp
:::Forex_training::: is a type of instruction or mentorship that provides information on forex trading tactics, methods and successful practices.  Forex, or the foreign exchange market, is the market where banks, companies, brokers, hedge funds, investors and other participants can buy, sell, exchange and speculate on currencies.     BREAKING DOWN 'Forex Training' Forex training is a guide for retail forex traders. Forex trading courses are often certified through a regulatory body or financial institution. In the United States, the SEC, the Chicago Board of Trade, the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority, the National Futures Association, the Futures Industry Association and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission are some of the boards that certify courses.   Mentors in forex training courses often help explain different strategies and risk management, as well as going through and placing actual trades.    The global forex market is massive in size, and it is the largest and most liquid financial market in the world. Because of this, there is a wealth of information available for traders who are looking to enhance their trading knowledge. https://www.investopedia.com/terms/forex/f/forex-currency-trading-training.asp
:::Hedge_funds::: are alternative investments using pooled funds that employ numerous different strategies to earn active return, or alpha, for their investors. Hedge funds may be aggressively managed or make use of derivatives and leverage in both domestic and international markets with the goal of generating high returns (either in an absolute sense or over a specified market benchmark). It is important to note that hedge funds are generally only accessible to accredited investors as they require less SEC regulations than other funds. One aspect that has set the hedge fund industry apart is the fact that hedge funds face less regulation than mutual funds and other investment vehicles.
:::An institutional_investor::: is a nonbank person or organization that trades securities in large enough share quantities or dollar amounts that it qualifies for preferential treatment and lower commissions.
A :::black_box_model:::, or more specifically, a black box financial model is a catch-all term used to describe a computer program designed to transform various data into useful investment strategies.   In science, computing and engineering, a black box is a device, system or object which can be viewed in terms of its inputs and outputs, without any knowledge of its internal workings. Its implementation is opaque or “black.” Almost anything might be referred to as a black box: a transistor, an algorithm or even the human brain.   The opposite of a black box is a system where the inner components or logic are available for inspection, which is most commonly referred to as a white box (which can also come be called a "clear box" or a "glass box").
:::Consolidation::: is a technical analysis term referring to security prices oscillating within a corridor and is generally interpreted as market indecisiveness. Said another way, consolidation is used in technical analysis to describe the movement of a stock's price within a well-defined pattern of trading levels. Consolidation is generally regarded as a period of indecision, which ends when the price of the asset moves above or below the prices in the trading pattern. Consolidation is also defined as a set of financial statements that presents a parent and a subsidiary company as one company.
To :::consolidate::: is to combine assets, liabilities, and other financial items of two or more entities into one. In the context of financial accounting, the term consolidate often refers to the consolidation of financial statements, where all subsidiaries report under the umbrella of a parent company. Consolidation also refers to the union of smaller companies into larger companies.
:::Fundamentals::: include the basic qualitative and quantitative information that contributes to the financial or economic well-being and the subsequent financial valuation of a company, security or currency. Analysts and investors examine these fundamentals to develop an estimate as to whether the underlying asset is considered a worthwhile investment; that is, whether it is fairly valued in the market, given an analysis of its business fundamentals. For businesses, information such as profitability, revenue, assets, liabilities and growth potential are considered fundamentals. Fundamental analysis, involving calculating a company's financial ratios, is the implementation of fundamentals into investment decision making.
:::Fundamental_analysis::: is a method of evaluating a security in an attempt to assess its intrinsic value, by examining related economic, financial, and other qualitative and quantitative factors. Fundamental analysts study anything that can affect the security's value, including macroeconomic factors (e.g. economy and industry conditions) and microeconomic factors (e.g. financial conditions and company management). The end goal of fundamental analysis is to produce a quantitative value that an investor can compare with a security's current price, thus indicating whether the security is undervalued or overvalued.
:::Intrinsic_value::: is the perceived or calculated value of a company, including tangible and intangible factors, using fundamental analysis. Also called the true value, the intrinsic value may or may not be the same as the current market value. Additionally, intrinsic value is also used in options pricing to indicate the amount that an option is "in the money."
A :::catalyst::: in equity markets is a revelation or event that propels the price of a security dramatically up or down. A catalyst can be almost anything: an earnings report, an analyst revision, a new product announcement, a piece of legislation, a lawsuit, an outbreak of war or unrest, an offer to buy a company or merge, a move by an activist investor, a comment from a CEO or government official, or the conspicuous absence of a company officer at a special event.    In general, it is a news item that has no immediate effect on the fundamentals of a stock, but rattles investors, breaking the price's upward or downward momentum – or sideways lack-of-momentum – and unlocking value (in the case of a rise in price) or bursting a bubble (in the case of a fall).
A :::filter_rule::: is a trading strategy in which technical analysts set rules for when to buy and sell investments, based on percentage changes in price from previous lows and highs. The filter rule is based generally on price momentum, or the belief that rising prices tend to continue to rise and falling prices tend to continue to fall. It is often considered a subjective screener, due to it being set by an analyst's own interpretation of a stock's historical price history.    BREAKING DOWN 'Filter Rule' A filter rule can be a good way to profit from changes in a security’s price. Technical analysis software programs will have certain features that allow analysts to implement filter rules.     Filter Rule Parameters: Technical analysts use their investing discretion when setting parameters for filter rule trading. Generally filter rules will be based on historical trends and security price patterns identified from technical analysis charts. Filter rules can include orders to buy or sell based on price increases or decreases. Typically trading percentage will be based on shorter-term trends which often result in price filter triggers for securities moving between 1% and 10%.
:::The_wash-sale_rule::: is an Internal Revenue Service (IRS) regulation established to disallow a tax deduction for a security sold in a wash sale. The rule defines a wash sale as one that occurs when an individual sells or trades a security at a loss and, within 30 days before or after this sale, buys a “substantially identical” stock or security, or acquires a contract or option to do so. A wash sale also results if an individual sells a security, and the spouse or a company controlled by the individual buys a substantially equivalent security.
A :::flash_crash::: is an event in electronic securities markets wherein the withdrawal of stock orders rapidly amplifies price declines. The result appears to be a rapid sell-off of securities that can happen over a few minutes, resulting in dramatic declines. A flash crash, like the one that occurred on May 6, 2010, is exacerbated as computer trading programs react to aberrations in the market, such as heavy selling in one or many securities, and automatically begin selling large volumes at an incredibly rapid pace to avoid losses. Flash crashes can trigger circuit breakers at major stock exchanges like the NYSE, which halt trading until buy and sell orders can be matched up evenly and trading can resume in an orderly fashion.
A :::trading_range::: occurs when a security trades between consistent high and low prices for a period of time. The top of a security’s trading range often provides price resistance, while the bottom of the trading range typically offers price support.    BREAKING DOWN 'Trading Range' When a stock breaks through or falls below its trading range, it usually means there is momentum (positive or negative) building. A breakout occurs when the price of a security breaks above a trading range, while a breakdown happens when the price falls below a trading range. Typically, breakouts and breakdowns are more reliable when they are accompanied by large volume, which suggests widespread participation by traders and investors.    Many investors look at the duration of a trading range. Large trending moves often follow extended range-bound periods. Day traders frequently use the trading range of the first half-hour of the trading session as a reference point for their intraday strategies. For example, a trader might buy a stock if it breaks above its opening trading range.
In financial terms, a :::rebound::: means a recovery from prior negative activity. For a security, a rebound means that it has moved higher from a lower price. For the general economy, a rebound means that economic activity has increased from lower levels, such as the bounce back following a recession. A recession is defined by economists as two consecutive quarters without economic growth. Recessions are part of the business cycle which consists of expansion, peak, recession, trough and recovery. A rebound from a recession would occur in the recovery stage.
:::Oversold::: is a widely used term that refers to a security that traders and analysts believe is trading below its true value. The term generally describes a short-term movement in the stock’s price rather than a long-term condition.   BREAKING DOWN 'Oversold' Oversold stocks are those that analysts feel are trading below their true value. This can be the result of bad news regarding the company in question, its industry or the overall market. Whatever the case, the oversold stock has fallen victim to an overreaction among investors and the supply of shares has exceeded demand. Investors commonly hold the misperception that this only happens to smaller, lesser-known companies. Research has shown that large-cap stocks are also subject to overselling but tend to recover more quickly than their smaller counterparts.
A :::double_bottom::: pattern is a technical analysis charting pattern that describes a change in trend and a momentum reversal from prior leading price action. It describes the drop of a stock or index, a rebound, another drop to the same or similar level as the original drop, and finally another rebound. The double bottom looks like the letter "W". The twice-touched low is considered a support level.
:::High-speed_data_feeds:::, which transmit data such as price quotes and yields in real time and without delays, are used in high-frequency trading for real time data analysis.   BREAKING DOWN 'High-Speed Data Feed' High-speed data feeds provide computerized algorithmic traders with faster more reliable data. Because high frequency trading (HFT) is driven by faster access to data, there has been a technological arms race, as data feeds and transactions approach the speed of light. HFT creates natural monopolies in market data, which critics say has given high-frequency traders an unfair advantage over institutional and retail investors.
:::Speed_resistance::: lines are a tool in technical analysis that is used for determining potential areas of support and resistance. This tool, consisting of three trend lines, is created by drawing the first trend line from the most recent low to the most recent high when the asset is in an uptrend, and from the most recent high to the most recent low when the asset is in a downtrend. The other two trend lines are drawn with smaller angles in an attempt to predict areas that will act as possible barriers in the event of a retracement.
:::Speed::: The rate at which the gamma of an option or warrant will change in relation to underlying price in the underlying market. More specifically, it is the third order derivative of an options value to price. A high speed value indicates that gamma is more sensitive to moves in price of the underlying asset.   BREAKING DOWN 'Speed' Speed is used by investors who utilize both delta-hedging and gamma-hedging option trading strategies, and provides the investor with information on the vega or delta of an option per year (the daily figure can be found by dividing the result by the number of days in the year). As the number of days left on the options contract get smaller and smaller, charm becomes more volatile and less accurate.
:::swing::: is a fluctuation in the value of an asset, liability or account. This term commonly refers to a situation in which the price of an asset experiences a significant change over a short period. Swing may also be used to reference swing trading; a short-term trading strategy in which a trader attempts to capture gains by holding a security for only a few days.    BREAKING DOWN 'Swing' A swing in the financial markets, which is caused by increased volatility, can be seen easily when the price of certain security undergoes rapid changes in value. Investors refer to these sharp shifts in price as a market swing. For example, it is not uncommon to see a major index swing from negative territory to positive territory just before the market close, or after an FOMC interest rate announcement.    Swing trading is often used by individual investors to capture profits from the day-to-day fluctuations in a security’s price movement. Traders who use this strategy, often use swing highs and swing lows to time their entry and exits points. To find the best stocks to swing trade, many traders use websites that have access to stock market scanners, such as Yahoo! Finance, Finviz.com and StockCharts.com.    On the other hand, financial institutions, such as banks, hedge funds and asset managers, do not often have the luxury of swing trading a position over a matter of days because the large size of their order would usually have too much impact on the price of the asset. (To learn more, see: Introduction to Swing Trading.)
:::Buy_weakness::: is a proactive trading strategy in which a trader generates profits from buying into a security that has reached a low level. Traders will generally either go long on a stock or enter into call options that bet on a rising price. A buy weakness strategy is the opposite of a "selling into strength" strategy.     BREAKING DOWN 'Buy Weakness' Buy weakness signals are often identified from following a trading channel. Trading channels may be either trend channels or envelope channels. Buy weakness trades focus on identifying a stock’s low point in order to profit from potential gains. Buying weakness and selling strength are two strategies derived from the basic concept of buy low, sell high. Buying weakness may also be referred to as buy a bounce or buy at support.
A :::trader::: is an individual who engages in the buying and selling of financial assets in any financial market, either for himself or on behalf of another person or institution. The main difference between a trader and an investor is the duration for which the person holds the asset. Investors tend to have a longer-term time horizon, while traders tend to hold assets for shorter periods of time to capitalize on short-term trends.     BREAKING DOWN 'Trader'    A trader can work for a financial institution, in which case he trades with the company's money and credit, and is paid a combination of salary and bonus. Alternatively, a trader can work for himself, which means he is trading with his own money and credit but keeps all of the profit for himself. Among the disadvantages of short-term trading are commission costs and paying away the bid/offer spread. Because traders frequently engage in short-term trading strategies to chase after profit, they can rack up large commission fees. However, an increasing number of highly competitive discount brokerages has made this cost less of an issue, while electronic trading platforms have tightened spreads in the foreign exchange market. There is also disadvantageous tax treatment of short-term capital gains in the United States.
:::Objective_probability::: is the probability that an event will occur based an analysis in which each measure is based on a recorded observation or a long history of collected data. The concept of subjective probability can be contrasted with the idea subjective estimate. Objective probabilities are a more accurate way to determine the probability of a given outcome than subjective measurements. An objective probability will examine past data and use mathematical equations involving the data to determine the likelihood of an independent event occurring. An independent event is an event whose outcome is not influenced by prior events. Subjective probability, by contrast, may utilize some method of data analysis, but is largely based on a person's estimate or intuition about a situation and the likely outcome.
:::The_addition_rule_for_probabilities::: describes two formulas, one for the probability for either of two mutually exclusive events happening and the other for the probability of two non-mutually events happening. The first formula is just the sum of the probabilities of the two events. The second formula is the sum of the probabilities of the two events minus the probability that both will occur.    Mathematically, the probability of two mutually exclusive events is denoted by: P(Y u Z) = P(Y) + P(Z)    Mathematically, the probability of two non-mutually exclusive events is denoted by: P(Y u Z) = P(Y) + P(Z) - P(Y n Z)
:::Subjective_probability::: is a type of probability derived from an individual's personal judgment about whether a specific outcome is likely to occur. It contains no formal calculations and only reflects the subject's opinions and past experience. Subjective probabilities differ from person to person, and contains a high degree of personal bias.    BREAKING DOWN 'Subjective Probability'    An example of subjective probability is asking New York Yankees fans, before the baseball season starts, about the chances of New York winning the World Series. While there is no absolute mathematical proof behind the answer to the example, fans might still reply in actual percentage terms, such as the Yankees having a 25% chance of winning the World Series.    Subjective probability is highly flexible, even in terms of one individual’s belief. While an individual may believe the chance of a specified event occurring is 25%, they could have a different belief when given a specific range from which to choose, such as 25% to 30%. This can occur even if no additional hard data is behind the change. https://www.investopedia.com/terms/s/subjective_probability.asp
:::Compound_probability::: is a mathematical term relating to the likeliness of two independent events occurring. Compound probability is equal to the probability of the first event multiplied by the probability of the second event. Compound probabilities are used by insurance underwriters to assess risks and assign premiums to various insurance products.
:::Conditional_probability::: is the likelihood of an event or outcome occurring based on the occurrence of a previous event or outcome. Conditional probability is calculated by multiplying the probability of the preceding event by the updated probability of the succeeding, or conditional, event.
An :::unconditional_probability::: is the independent chance that a single outcome results from a sample of possible outcomes. The term refers to the likelihood that an event will take place independent of whether any other events take place or any other conditions are present. The probability that snow will fall in Jackson, Wyoming on Groundhog Day, without taking into consideration the historical weather patterns and climate data for northwestern Wyoming in early February is an example of an unconditional probability.
:::The_trend::: is the general direction of a market or of the price of a security. In technical analysis, trends are identified by trendlines that connect a series of highs or lows. Most traders trade in the same direction as a trend, while contrarians seek to identify reversals. Trends can also apply to interest rates, bond yields, and other markets where they're characterized by a long-term movement in price or volume.     BREAKING DOWN 'Trend'    Technical analysis was founded on the premise that security prices trend over time, which makes identifying the trend one of the most important elements of the practice. Traders can identify the trend using various forms of technical analysis, including both trendlines and technical indicators. For example, trendlines might show the direction of a trend while the relative strength index (RSI) is designed to show the strength of a trend at any given point in time. Many traders live by the mantra, "the trend is your friend," with the exception of contrarians that seek to identify reversals.    Trends may also be used by investors focused on fundamental analysis, which looks at changes in the revenue, earnings, or other business metrics. For example, fundamental analysts may look for trends in earnings per share and revenue growth. If earnings have grown for the past four quarters, this represents a positive trend. However, if earnings have declined for the past four quarters, it represents a negative trend. https://www.investopedia.com/terms/t/trend.asp
:::Trend_trading::: is a trading strategy that attempts to capture gains through the analysis of a security's momentum in a particular direction. Trend traders enter into a long position when a security is trending upward (e.g. successively higher highs) and/or enter a short position when a security is trending lower (e.g. successively lower highs).
A :::trendline::: is a line drawn over pivot highs or under pivot lows to show the prevailing direction of price. Trendlines are a visual representation of support and resistance in any timeframe. They show direction and speed of price, and also describe patterns during periods of price contraction.
:::Trend_analysis::: is a technique used in technical analysis that attempts to predict the future stock price movements based on recently observed trend data. Trend analysis is based on the idea that what has happened in the past gives traders an idea of what will happen in the future. There are three main types of trends: short-, intermediate- and long-term.
A :::sideways_trend::: is the horizontal price movement that occurs when the forces of supply and demand are nearly equal. This typically occurs during a period of consolidation before the price continues a prior trend or reverses into a new trend.    A sideways price trend is also commonly known as a "horizontal trend."
A :::downtrend::: occurs when the price of an asset moves lower over a period of time. While the price may move intermittently higher or lower, downtrends are characterized by lower peaks and lower troughs over time.    Notice how each successive peak and trough is lower than the previous one. For example, the low at Point 3 is lower than the low at Point 1. The downtrend will be deemed broken once the price closes above the high at Point 4.    An uptrend is the opposite of a downtrend, while markets that are moving sideways are known as ranging or range-bound markets.     BREAKING DOWN 'Downtrend'     Many traders seek to avoid downtrends because they can adversely affect the value of any investment. A downtrend can last for minutes, days, weeks, months or even years, so identifying a downtrend early is very important. Once a downtrend has been established (series of lower peaks) a trader should be very cautious about entering into any new long positions.    Short sellers seek to profit from downtrends by borrowing and then immediately selling shares with the agreement to repurchase them in the future. These are known as short positions or short selling. If the asset's price continues to decline, the trader profits from the difference between the immediate sale price and the lower future repurchase price.    Often times, traders use technical indicators and chart patterns to identify and confirm downtrends. Moving averages, for example, can be used to identify the overall trend. If the price is lower than a moving average, the stock is likely to be in a downtrend, and vice versa for an uptrend. Momentum indicators, such as the relative strength index (RSI), can also show the magnitude or strength of the downtrend at a given point in time, which can help when deciding whether or not to enter a short position.
A :::countertrend_strategy::: is a trading method that attempts to make small gains by trading against the current trend. Traders also refer to the practice as "countertrend trading." Contrarian traders employ countertrend trading strategies. They attempt to purchase shares when a security’s price is low and sell when it’s high. Traders who use this strategy realize smaller gains and are prepared to forego the bulk of a trending move. A countertrend strategy ignores the popular investment philosophy "the trend is your friend."
:::Confluence::: is the combination of multiple strategies and ideas into one complete strategy. Confluence occurs when two separate ideas/strategies are used together to form an investment strategy that is in line with an investor's risk profile and goals. This term can also be used when doing technical analysis, by looking at charts and developing levels where different indicators are combined to help identify possible opportunities.
:::The_price_rate_of_change::: (ROC:) is a technical indicator of momentum that measures the percentage change in price between the current price and the price n periods in the past. It is calculated by using the following formula:   ROC = (Most recent closing price - Closing price n periods ago) / Closing price n periods ago x 100
A :::variable_cost::: is a corporate expense that changes in proportion with production output. Variable costs increase or decrease depending on a company's production volume; they rise as production increases and fall as production decreases.
A :::dirty_float::: is a floating exchange rate where a country's central bank occasionally intervenes to change the direction or the pace of change of a country's currency value. In most instances, the central bank in a dirty float system acts as a buffer against an external economic shock before its effects become disruptive to the domestic economy. A dirty float is also known as a "managed float."
:::The_interest_rate_risk::: is the risk that an investment's value will change due to a change in the absolute level of interest rates, in the spread between two rates, in the shape of the yield curve, or in any other interest rate relationship. Such changes usually affect securities inversely and can be reduced by diversifying (investing in fixed-income securities with different durations) or hedging (such as through an interest rate swap).
:::Earnings_management::: is the use of accounting techniques to produce financial reports that present an overly positive view of a company's business activities and financial position. Many accounting rules and principles require company management to make judgments following these principles. Earnings management takes advantage of how accounting rules are applied and creates financial statements that inflate earnings, revenue, or total assets.
:::Intraday::: is another way of saying "within the day." Intraday price movements are particularly important to short-term traders looking to make many trades over the course of a single trading session. The term intraday is occasionally used to describe securities that trade on the markets during regular business hours, such as stocks and exchanged-traded funds (ETF), as opposed to mutual funds, which must be bought from a dealer.
:::Investing::: is the act of committing money or capital to an endeavor (a business, project, real estate, etc.), with the expectation of obtaining an additional income or profit. Investing also can include the amount of time you put into the study of a prospective company.
An :::investment::: is an asset or item acquired with the goal of generating income or appreciation. In an economic sense, an investment is the purchase of goods that are not consumed today but are used in the future to create wealth. In finance, an investment is a monetary asset purchased with the idea that the asset will provide income in the future or will later be sold at a higher price for a profit.
:::Investment_securities::: are securities (tradable financial assets, such as equities or fixed income instruments) that are purchased in order to be held for investment. This is in contrast to securities, which are purchased by a broker-dealer or other intermediary, for quick resale (i.e. trading account securities). Investment Securities are subject to governance via Article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code (UCC).
:::Predictive_analytics::: describe the use of statistics and modeling to determine future performance based on current and historical data. Predictive analytics look at patterns in data to determine if those patterns are likely to emerge again, which allows businesses and investors to adjust where they use their resources in order to take advantage of possible future events.
:::Economic_forecasting::: is the process of attempting to predict the future condition of the economy using a combination of important and widely followed indicators. Economic forecasting typically tries to come up with a future gross domestic product (GDP) growth rate, involving the building of statistical models with inputs of several key variables, or indicators. Some of the primary economic indicators include inflation, interest rates, industrial production, consumer confidence, worker productivity, retail sales and unemployment rates, to name several.
:::Data_analytics::: is the science of drawing insights from raw information sources. Many of the techniques and processes of data analytics have been automated into mechanical processes and algorithms that work over raw data for human consumption. Data analytics techniques can reveal trends and metrics that would otherwise be lost in the mass of information. This information can then be used to optimize processes to increase the overall efficiency of a business or system.
:::Forecasting::: is a technique that uses historical data as inputs to make informed estimates that are predictive in determining the direction of future trends. Businesses utilize forecasting to determine how to allocate their budgets or plan for anticipated expenses for an upcoming period of time. This is typically based on the projected demand for the goods and services offered.
A :::speculative_market::: that is based on speculations regarding events, such as who will win an election or whether a sports player will be resigned to a team. All of the "trades" involve a prediction with an unambiguous outcome. 
:::Profit::: is a financial benefit that is realized when the amount of revenue gained from a business activity exceeds the expenses, costs and taxes needed to sustain the activity. Any profit that is gained goes to the business's owners, who may or may not decide to spend it on the business. Profit is calculated as total revenue less total expenses.
:::Profit_margin::: is a profitability ratios calculated as net income divided by revenue, or net profits divided by sales. Net income or net profit may be determined by subtracting all of a company’s expenses, including operating costs, material costs (including raw materials) and tax costs, from its total revenue. Profit margins are expressed as a percentage and, in effect, measure how much out of every dollar of sales a company actually keeps in earnings. A 20% profit margin, then, means the company has a net income of $0.20 for each dollar of total revenue earned.    While there are a few different kinds of profit margins – including “gross profit margin,” “operating margin,” (or "operating profit margin") “pretax profit margin,” and “net margin” (or "net profit margin") – the term “profit margin” is also often used simply to refer to net margin. The method of calculating profit margin when the term is used in this way can be represented with the following formula:    Profit Margin = Net Income / Net Sales (revenue)    Other types of profit margins have different ways of calculating net income so as to break down a company’s earnings in different ways and for different purposes.    Profit margin is similar but distinct from the term “profit percentage,” which divides net profit on sales by the cost of goods sold to help determine the amount of profit a company makes on selling its goods, rather than the amount of profit a company is making relative to its total expenditures.
:::Data_science::: is a field of Big Data geared toward providing meaningful information based on large amounts of complex data. Data science, or data-driven science, combines different fields of work in statistics and computation in order to interpret data for the purpose of decision making.    BREAKING DOWN 'Data Science'    Data is drawn from different sectors and platforms including cell phones, social media, e-commerce sites, healthcare surveys, internet searches, etc. The increase in the amount of data available opened the door to a new field of study called Big Data — or the extremely large data sets that can help produce better operational tools in all sectors. The continually increasing sets of and easy access to data are made possible by a collaboration of companies known as fintech, which use technology to innovate and enhance traditional financial products and services. The data produced creates even more data which is easily shared across entities thanks to emergent fintech products like cloud computing and storage. However, the interpretation of vast amounts of unstructured data for effective decision making may prove too complex and time consuming for companies, hence the emergence of data science.
:::Machine_learning::: is the concept that a computer program can learn and adapt to new data without human interference. Machine learning is a field of artificial intelligence (AI) that keeps a computer’s built-in algorithms current regardless of changes in the worldwide economy.    BREAKING DOWN 'Machine Learning'    Various sectors of the economy are dealing with huge amounts of data available in different formats from disparate sources. The enormous amount of data, known as big data, is becoming easily available and accessible due to the progressive use of technology. Companies and governments realize the huge insights that can be gained from tapping into big data but lack the resources and time required to comb through its wealth of information. As such, artificial intelligence measures are being employed by different industries to gather, process, communicate, and share useful information from data sets. One method of AI that is increasingly utilized for big data processing is machine learning.
:::Deep_Learning::: is an artificial intelligence function that imitates the workings of the human brain in processing data and creating patterns for use in decision making. Deep learning is a subset of machine learning in Artificial Intelligence (AI) that has networks capable of learning unsupervised from data that is unstructured or unlabeled.    Also known as Deep Neural Learning or Deep Neural Network.
:::Artificial_intelligence::: (AI:) is a term for simulated intelligence in machines. These machines are programmed to "think" like a human and mimic the way a person acts. The ideal characteristic of artificial intelligence is its ability to rationalize and take actions that have the best chance of achieving a specific goal, although the term can be applied to any machine that exhibits traits associated with a human mind, such as learning and solving problems.     :::BREAKING DOWN 'Artificial Intelligence - AI'     Artificial intelligence is based around the idea that human intelligence can be defined in such exact terms that a machine can mimic it. The goals of artificial intelligence include learning, reasoning and perception, and machines are wired using a cross-disciplinary approach based in mathematics, computer science, linguistics, psychology and more.    As technology advances, previous benchmarks that defined artificial intelligence become outdated. For example, machines that calculate basic functions or recognize text through methods such as optimal character recognition are no longer said to have artificial intelligence, since this function is now taken for granted as an inherent computer function.    Some examples of machines with artificial intelligence include computers that play chess, which have been around for years, and self-driving cars, which are a relatively new development. Each of these machines must weigh the consequences of any action they take, as each action will impact the end result. In chess, this end result is winning the game. For self-driving cars, the computer system must take into account all external data and compute it to act in a way that prevents collision 
:::Business_intelligence::: (BI:) refers to the procedural and technical infrastructure that collects, stores and analyzes the data produced by a company’s activities. Business intelligence is a broad term that encompasses data mining, process analysis, performance benchmarking, descriptive analytics, and so on. Business intelligence is meant to take in all the data generated by a business and present easy-to-digest performance measures and trends that will inform management decisions.
:::Strong_Artificial_Intelligence::: (AI:) is a form of machine intelligence that is equal to human intelligence. Key characteristics of strong AI include the ability to reason, solve puzzles, make judgments, plan, learn and communicate. It should also have consciousness, objective thoughts, self-awareness, sentience, and sapience.    Strong AI is also called True Intelligence or Artificial General Intelligence (AGI).    BREAKING DOWN 'Strong AI'     Strong AI does not currently exist. Some experts think it may be developed by 2030 or 2045. Others more conservatively predict that it may be developed within the next century or that the development of Strong AI may not be possible at all.   Some theorists argue that a machine with Strong AI should be able to go through the same development process as a human, starting with a childlike mind and developing an adult mind through learning. It should be able to interact with the world and learn from it, acquiring its own common sense and language. Another argument is that we will not know when we have developed strong AI (if it can indeed be developed) because there is no consensus on what constitutes intelligence.    While Weak AI merely simulates human cognition, Strong AI would actually have human cognition. With Strong AI, a single system could theoretically handle all the same problems that a single human could. While Weak AI can replace many low- and medium-skilled workers, Strong AI might be necessary to replace certain categories of highly skilled workers.
:::Knowledge_engineering::: is a field of artificial intelligence (AI) that creates rules to apply to data in order to imitate the thought process of a human expert. It looks at the structure of a task or a decision to identify how a conclusion is reached. A library of problem-solving methods and the collateral knowledge used for each can then be created and served up as problems to be diagnosed by the system. The resulting software could then assist in diagnosis, trouble-shooting and solving issues either on its own or in a support role to a human agent.     :::BREAKING DOWN 'Knowledge Engineering'    Knowledge engineering sought to transfer the expertise of problem-solving human experts into a program that could take in the same data and come to the same conclusion. This approach is referred to as the transfer process and it dominated early knowledge engineering attempts. It fell out of favor, however, as scientists and programmers realized that the knowledge being used by humans in decision making is not always explicit. While many decisions can be traced back to previous experience on what worked, humans draw on parallel pools of knowledge that don’t always appear logically connected to the task at hand. Some of what CEOs and star investors refer to as gut feeling or intuitive leaps is better described as analogous reasoning and nonlinear thinking. These modes of thought don’t lend themselves to direct, step-by-step decision trees and may require pulling in sources of data that appear to cost more to bring in and process than it is worth.     The transfer process has been left behind in favor of a modeling process. Instead of attempting to follow the step-by-step process of a decision, knowledge engineering is focused on creating a system that will hit upon the same results as the expert without following the same path or tapping the same information sources. This eliminates some of the issues of tracking down the knowledge being used for nonlinear thinking, as the people doing it are often not aware of the information they are pulling on. As long as the conclusions are comparable, the model works. Once a model is consistently coming close to the human expert, it can then be refined. Bad conclusions can be traced back and debugged, and processes that are creating equivalent or improved conclusions can be encouraged.
:::Body_of_knowledge::: (BOK:) refers to the core teachings and skills required to work in a particular field or industry. The body of knowledge (BOK) is usually defined by professional associations or societies. Members of the profession outline what is needed to do their jobs and that forms the foundation for the curriculum of most professional programs or designations. People seeking to enter the profession must display their mastery of the body of knowledge in order to receive accreditation that enables them to practice these skills. Candidates usually demonstrate their mastery of the body of knowledge by passing rigorous examinations. These exams can be a single session or the accreditation can be done level by level, requiring a person to practice at a particular level for a set amount of time before challenging the next level.     BREAKING DOWN 'Body of Knowledge - BOK'     Body of knowledge is a more formal way of referring to things we more commonly call core competencies and required skills today. Not unlike a job advertisement, the body of knowledge is a list of things you must know and things you must be able to do before you will be accepted as a professional by the organization doing the accreditation. Universities have a defined body of knowledge that a student must demonstrate their familiarity with before being granted a degree. Trades have a body of knowledge that an apprentice works through in order to become a full journeyman of the trade. The actual contents of the body of knowledge for a particular profession evolves over time. This is one of the reasons that associations are often in charge of accreditation, as it is very difficult for people outside of a particular industry to keep up with new techniques and developments. 
An :::algorithm::: is set of instructions for solving a problem or accomplishing a task. One common example of an algorithm is a recipe, which consists of specific instructions for preparing a dish/meal. Every computerized device uses algorithms to perform its functions.     BREAKING DOWN 'Algorithm'     Financial companies use algorithms in areas such as loan pricing, stock trading, and asset-liability management. For example, algorithmic trading, known as "algo," is used for deciding the timing, pricing, and quantity of stock orders.  Algo trading, also known as automated trading or black-box trading, uses a computer program to buy or sell securities at a pace not possible for humans. Since prices of stocks, bonds, and commodities appear in various formats online and in trading data, the process by which an algorithm digests scores of financial data becomes easy. The user of the program simply sets the parameters and gets the desired output when securities meet the trader's criteria.     Types of Algos     Several types of trading algorithms help investors decide whether to buy or sell. A mean reversion algorithm examines short-term prices over the long-term average price, and if a stock goes much higher than the average, a trader may sell it for a quick profit. Seasonality refers to the practice of traders buying and selling securities based on the time of year when markets typically rise or fall. A sentiment analysis algorithm gauges news about a stock price that could lead to higher volume for a trading period.    Algorithm Example     The following is an example of an algorithm for trading. A trader creates instructions within his automated account to sell 100 shares of a stock if the 50-day moving average goes below the 200-day moving average. Contrarily, the trader could create instructions to buy 100 shares if the 50-day moving average of a stock rises above the 200-day moving average. Sophisticated algorithms consider hundreds of criteria before buying or selling securities.  Computers quickly synthesize the automated account instructions to produce desired results.  Without computers, complex trading would be time-consuming and possibly impossible.     Algorithms in Computer Science     In computer science, a programmer must employ five basic parts of an algorithm to create a successful program. First, he/she describes the problem in mathematical terms before creating the formulas and processes that create results. Next, the programmer inputs the outcome parameters, and then he/she executes the program repeatedly to test its accuracy. The conclusion of the algorithm is the result given after the parameters go through the set of instructions in the program.    For financial algorithms, the more complex the program, the more data the software can use to make accurate assessments to buy or sell securities. Programmers test complex algorithms thoroughly to ensure the programs are without errors.  Many algorithms can be used for one problem; however, there are some that simplify the process better than others.
A :::security::: is a fungible, negotiable financial instrument that holds some type of monetary value. It represents an ownership position in a publicly-traded corporation (via stock), a creditor relationship with a governmental body or a corporation (represented by owning that entity's bond), or rights to ownership as represented by an option.     BREAKING DOWN 'Security'     Securities can be broadly categorized into two distinct types: equities and debts.       An equity security represents ownership interest held by shareholders in an entity (a company, partnership or trust), realized in the form of shares of capital stock, which includes shares of both common and preferred stock. Holders of equity securities are typically not entitled to regular payments (though equity securities often do pay out dividends), but they are able to profit from capital gains when they sell the securities (assuming they've increased in value, naturally). Equity securities do entitle the holder to some control of the company on a pro rata basis, via voting rights. In the case of bankruptcy, they share only in residual interest after all obligations have been paid out to creditors.      A debt security represents money that is borrowed and must be repaid, with terms that stipulates the size of the loan, interest rate and maturity or renewal date. Debt securities, which include government and corporate bonds, certificates of deposit (CDs) and collateralized securities (such as CDOs​ and CMOs​), generally entitle their holder to the regular payment of interest and repayment of principal (regardless of the issuer's performance), along with any other stipulated contractual rights (which do not include voting rights). They are typically issued for a fixed term, at the end of which they can be redeemed by the issuer. Debt securities can be secured (backed by collateral) or unsecured, and, if unsecured, may be contractually prioritized over other unsecured, subordinated debt in the case of a bankruptcy. 
:::Panic_selling::: refers to wide-scale selling of an investment, causing a sharp decline in price. In most instances of panic selling, investors just want to get out of the investment, with little regard for the price at which they sell.    BREAKING DOWN 'Panic Selling'     Panic selling can be caused by various factors. It can also range in severity. In some instances, panic selling may also be known as a selloff.    Panic Selling Catalysts    Panic selling is often triggered by an event that significantly decreases investor confidence in a stock. Events can be related to a variety of factors including sales growth, revenue levels, earnings, management changes or decisions, and more. Initial selling of an investment is typically triggered by decreased strength in its fundamentals. Further losses can accumulate from price point levels that trigger programmed market trading from stop loss orders. (See also: How to Profit from Panic Selling)   A significant factor in panic selling can be irrational exuberance or highly emotional trading. These trades can be driven by fear, market sentiment and overreaction to news that may only have short-term affects.    Most major stock exchanges will use trading curbs and halts to limit panic selling. This allows people to digest information on why the selling is occurring. It also limits the downside losses an investor can incur in a single day and restores some degree of normalcy to the market.    Financial Market Selloffs    Selloffs are also a common occurrence in the financial markets that may be typically less severe than dramatic panic selling. In a selloff a particular sector may see widespread selling due to the negative press from only a few companies. Selloffs also occur broadly across the market when trends in various asset classes are reported. For example, higher yielding Treasuries can lead to a selloff in equities.    Opportunities in Losses    In some cases, panic selling and broad market selloffs can create buying opportunities. This is especially true when selling is caused by short-term indicators or uncertainty. Markets are often extremely volatile and views on unfolding events can alter the outlook drastically from day to day.    Many market traders watch for selling opportunities that may make the investment more attractive at its lower price. In technical analysis, the Exhausted Selling Model is one technique traders can use to identify the price trading trough for which a reversal is likely to follow. Prices will go through a number of phases as they descend from panic selling so this model relies on following a stock’s downward trend and skillfully identifying the trough buying opportunity.
:::The_yearly_rate_of_return_method:::, commonly referred to as annual percentage rate, is the interest rate earned on a fund throughout an entire year. The yearly rate of return is calculated by taking the amount of money gained or lost at the end of the year and dividing it by the initial investment at the beginning of the year. This method is also referred to as the annual rate of return or the nominal annual rate.
:::Annual_return::: is the return an investment provides over a period of time, expressed as a time-weighted annual percentage. Sources of returns can include dividends, returns of capital and capital appreciation. The rate of annual return is measured against the initial amount of the investment and represents a geometric mean rather than a simple arithmetic mean.
:::Finance::: is a term describing the study and system of money, investments, and other financial instruments. Some people prefer to divide finance into three distinct categories: public finance, corporate finance, and personal finance. There is also the recently emerging area of social finance. Behavioral finance seeks to identify the cognitive (e.g. emotional, social, and psychological) reasons behind financial decisions.
:::Bioinformatics::: is the application of computational technology to handle the rapidly growing repository of information related to molecular biology. Bioinformatics combines different fields of study, including computer sciences, molecular biology, biotechnology, statistics and engineering. It is particularly useful for managing and analyzing large sets of data, such as those generated by the fields of genomics and proteomics.
:::Natural_Language_Processing::: (NLP:) is a field of artificial intelligence that enables computers to analyze and understand human language. It was formulated to build software that generates and comprehends natural languages, so that a user can have natural conversations with his or her computer instead of through programming or artificial languages like Java or C.
:::The_singularity:::, or technological singularity, is the idea that the creation of artificial superintelligence could result in unstoppable exponential growth. This rapidly advancing technology could alter the world as we know it because humans may not be able to keep up with or control these advances.
:::Turing_Test::: A measure of determining whether a machine can demonstrate human intelligence in thoughts, words, or actions. The Turing Test was proposed by Alan Turing in 1950 and is the basis for the philosophy behind Artificial Intelligence (AI).
:::Financial_analysis::: is the process of evaluating businesses, projects, budgets and other finance-related entities to determine their performance and suitability. Typically, financial analysis is used to analyze whether an entity is stable, solvent, liquid or profitable enough to warrant a monetary investment. When looking at a specific company, a financial analyst conducts analysis by focusing on the income statement, balance sheet, and cash flow statement.
:::Investment_analysis::: is a broad term that encompasses many different aspects of investing. It can include analyzing past returns to make predictions about future returns, selecting the type of investment vehicle that is best for an investor's needs or evaluating securities such as stocks and bonds for valuation and investor specificity.
:::Autotrading::: is a trading plan based around the buying and selling of orders placed automatically from an underlying system or program. The buy or sell orders are sent out to be executed in the market when a certain set of criteria is met.     BREAKING DOWN 'Autotrading'     Autotrading is a type of trading plan that allows investors to capitalize on market opportunities in real time. It typically involves complex programming through advanced software trading systems. Traders can program software systems to make automatic trades based on a customized trading strategy. Basic forms of autotrading can also be utilized by all types of retail investors. Overall, autotrading systems are used in a wide range of markets including stocks, futures, options and forex.     Autotrading Capabilities     Generally autotrading requires a pre-determined trading strategy. It can be structured in various ways for all types of investors. Retail investors may deploy basic autotrading plans through the use of automated investing at specific times or through conditional orders on brokerage platforms. Conditional orders allow an investor to enter trades at specified levels for automatic execution when a price is reached.   Institutional investors and technical traders will use complex trading systems that allow for conditional orders and grid trading. These investors use more complex conditional orders that can be generated through advanced charting software systems, advanced trading platforms or a combination of both. Many technical day traders will subscribe to trading systems such as ProfitSource that work in connection with a trading platform to place automated trades. Brokerage platforms such as TD Ameritrade and Interactive Brokers are also popular for technical autotraders. Institutional investors will typically have their own proprietary trading platforms that allow for auto trading through algorithmic programming. (See also Choosing the Right Day-Trading Software)     Autotrading Strategies     Investors use autotrading to execute pre-programmed trades in real time. Autotrading allows all types of investors to build trading plans for capitalizing on their own trading strategies. Institutional investors may use complex algorithms that seek to place trades for investment portfolios based on defined criteria governed by a portfolio’s objective.    Technical day traders will use auto trading to invest based on technical market signals. Many day traders choose to automate investing through a grid trading strategy. Grid trading strategies can be useful for investing into a trend as they allow automated investing triggered by incremental moves of the security’s price in a specified direction.   Technical day traders also commonly use complex conditional orders for auto trading. These types of orders allow an investor to specify an entry price and build a collar around the trade to institute pre-determined profit and loss levels for risk management. Autotrading is also popular for investors in the forex market. Forex autotrading also allows for customized programming. Many forex traders will choose to invest with preset autotrading platforms that offer autotrading based on trading strategies developed by the software provider. (See also Forex automation software for hands-free trading)
:::Reversal_amount::: describes the level of price movement required to shift a chart to the right. This condition is used on charts that only take into consideration price movement instead of both price and time.     BREAKING DOWN 'Reversal Amount'    In the context of point and figure (P&F) charts, the reversal amount is the number of boxes (an X or an O) required to cause a reversal. A reversal would be represented by a movement to the next column and a change of direction. If you increase the reversal amount, you will remove columns corresponding to less significant trends and make it easier to detect long-term trends. In terms of Kagi charts, it is the amount (generally around 4%) needed to change the direction of the vertical lines.    On a fundamental level, technical analysis is grounded in the quest for spotting market reversals, be they upward or downward movements from the market's current trajectory. Naturally, this is easier said than done. Psychologically, reacting optimally to reversals can be incredibly difficult for even seasoned technical analysis strategist and traders. In many ways, this is because, in the early stages of an actual reversal, not just one that's perceived, the market still shows many indications of a continued move in the original direction.
:::Satisficing::: is a decision-making strategy that aims for a satisfactory or adequate result, rather than the optimal solution. Rather than put maximum exertion towards attaining the most ideal outcome, satisficing focuses on pragmatic effort when confronted with tasks. This is because aiming for the optimal solution may necessitate needless expenditure of time, energy and resources.   The strategy can include adopting a minimalist approach in regards to achieving the first attainable resolution that meets basic acceptable outcomes. Satisficing narrows the scope of options that are considered to achieve those outcomes, setting aside options that would call for more intensive, complex, or unfeasible efforts to attempt attain more optimal results. The term "satisfice" was coined by American scientist and Noble-laureate Herbert Simon in 1956.    BREAKING DOWN 'Satisficing'     The theory of satisficing finds application in a number of fields including economics, artificial intelligence and sociology. Satisficing implies that a consumer, when confronted with a plethora of choices for a specific need, will select a product or service that is "good enough," rather than expending effort and resources on finding the best possible or optimal choice.    If a consumer were to require a tool to process and resolve a problem, under a satisficing strategy they would look to the simplest, most readily accessible piece of equipment regardless of more effective options being available at greater cost and time. For instance, that may include the use of a single software title versus procuring an entire software suite that includes supplemental features.     How Satisficing Is Applied     Organizations that adopt satisficing as a strategy might seek to meet the minimal expectations for revenue and profit set by the board of directors and other shareholders. This contrasts with attempting to maximize profits through concerted efforts that put higher demands on the performance of the organization across sales, marketing, and other departments.    By aspiring to targets that are more attainable, the effort put forth may be equitable with the final results. Such a strategy might also be applied if a company’s leadership chooses to put only nominal effort towards one objective in order to prioritize resources to achieve optimal solutions for another goal. Reducing staffing at a tertiary worksite to minimal operational levels could allow for personnel to be reassigned to other divisions and projects where more substantial labor is required for maximized results.   A limitation of satisficing is that the definition of what constitutes a satisfactory result has not necessarily been determined, nor is it universally clear that such a result differs from pursuit of an optimal outcome.
:::Optimization::: is the process of making a trading system more effective by adjusting the variables used for technical analysis.     BREAKING DOWN 'Optimization'     Optimization, in order to work, requires that systems constantly adjust to hit a moving target. From changing the quantity of periods used in moving averages to just simply taking out what doesn't work, optimization is an ongoing process.    Trading systems are developed over a long period of time. Once they have been created, there is a period of beta testing and then optimization based on those results. Once the system has been implemented, real world factors will come into play and may highlight issues that weren’t previously detected. Optimization doesn’t just occur when there are issues. Systems can adjust to be optimized based on changing factors in the market or based off recent technological advancements as well. Finding the best possible combination of settings and factors for the system parameters is vital to the success of any system. In fact, to work correctly a system should continue to periodically re-optimize based on current data and real-world factors.   As with most things, there is still potential for even an optimized system to fail. Additionally, a system can become over-optimized. For example, it may have sample sizes or period durations that are too small to be accurate, or too large to provide fine-tuned information. Also, each factor or rule that is applied to the system can take away from the system’s ability to provide accurate information.  
:::The_close::: is the end of a trading session in the financial markets when the markets close. It can also refer to the process of exiting a trade or the final procedure in a financial transaction in which contract documents are signed and recorded.
A :::trading_session::: is a period of time that comprises a single day of business in a financial market, from that market’s opening bell to its closing bell. Within that trading session, buyers and sellers both participate in setting current market prices, and all orders for that day must be placed within the pre-established time frame parameters of the trading session.
:::Close_Position::: Closing a position refers to executing a security transaction that is the exact opposite of an open position, thereby nullifying it and eliminating the initial exposure. Closing a long position in a security would entail selling it, while closing a short position in a security would involve buying it back. Taking offsetting positions in swaps is also very common to eliminate exposure prior to maturity.    Close position is also known as "position squaring."
:::Data_loss::: occurs when valuable and/or sensitive information on a computer is compromised due to theft, human error, viruses, malware, or power failure. It may also occur due to physical damage or mechanical failure or equipment or an edifice. The biggest reasons for data loss include laptop theft, accidental deletion or overwriting of files, power outages and surges, spilled liquids, and the wearing out or sudden failure of hard drives. Regularly backing up files makes data recovery possible in the event of data loss. For data that hasn’t been backed up, professional recovery services might be able to restore lost data. Servers can also suffer from data loss, just like individual computers and devices can.    Data Loss: Common Causes     Power surges and outages hurt computers by causing operating systems to shut down suddenly without following the proper procedures. The file corruption that can result can make it impossible to reboot the computer. Liquid spills onto laptop keyboards can seep into the casing and damage the internal components, especially in the case of acidic or sugary drinks, so it’s a good idea to keep liquids away from laptops or use a spill-proof travel mug.    Hard drives have moving parts that can experience mechanical failure due to wearing out, overheating, electrostatic discharge, or being dropped. They can also fail due to file corruption, improper drive formatting, or software corruption. Hard drives may fail and experience data loss suddenly, or they may show signs of slowly failing, such as crashing repeatedly, becoming increasingly slow or making unusual noises. Creating regular data backups of hard drive data helps protect against this form of data loss. For example, an individual might back up her personal files from her desktop computer to both an external hard drive and the cloud. Having the data stored in three places that face different risks minimizes the risk of total data loss.     Data Loss: The Human Element     A major threat of data loss for businesses comes from employees who aren’t aware of the risks they are taking. Companies need a way to control how their data is shared by monitoring and protecting business documents whenever and wherever employees are using, storing, or transmitting them, whether in email attachments, via smartphone, on laptops, on flash drives, or in cloud storage, to protect against data loss. Preventing data loss is important for companies to protect their privacy and intellectual property as well as comply with government regulations. Organizations can employ data loss prevention (DLP) features in software from providers like Google and Microsoft to protect against data loss. There are also data loss prevention suites from providers such as Clearswift, Symantec, Digital Guardian, Forcepoint, McAfee, among others.
:::The_win/loss_ratio::: is the ratio of the total number of winning trades to the number of losing trades. It does not take into account how much was won or lost, but simply if they were winners or losers.    Win/Loss Ratio = Winning Trades : Losing Trades.    Percentage-wise, it is simply calculated as Winning Trades/Losing Trades.    The win/loss ratio is also known as "success ratio."    BREAKING DOWN 'Win/Loss Ratio'     The win/loss ratio is used mostly by day traders to assess their wins and losses. It is used with the win-rate, that is, the number of trades won out of total trades, to determine the probability of a trader’s success. A win/loss ratio above 1.0 or a win-rate above 50% is usually favorable. For example, if you made 30 trades of which 12 were winners and 18 were losers, your win/loss ratio would be 2:3. In percentage format, the win/loss rate is 12/18 = 2/3 = 0.67, which means that you are losing 67% of the time more than you are winning. Your win-rate, or probability of success, would be 12/30 = 40%.    The win/loss ratio is used to calculate the risk/reward ratio, which is the profit potential of a trade relative to its loss potential. The profit potential of a trade is determined by the difference between the entry price and the target price at which a profit will be made. The risk is measured using a stop-loss order on the trade and is determined by the difference between the entry point and the stop-loss price. For example, a trader purchases 100 shares of a company for $5.50 and places a stop loss at $5.00. The trader also places a sell limit price at $6.50. The risk on the trade is $5.50 - $5.00 = $0.50, and the potential profit is $6.50 - $5.50 = $1.00. The trader is, thus, willing to risk $0.50 per share to make a profit of $1.00 per share after closing the position. The risk/reward ratio is $0.50/$1.00 = 0.5. In this case, the trader’s risk is half of his potential payoff. If the ratio is greater than 1.0, it means the risk is greater than the profit potential on the trade. If the ratio is less than 1.0, then the profit potential is greater than the risk.    Having a high win rate doesn't necessarily mean a trader will be successful or even profitable, as a high win rate means little if the risk-reward is very high, and high risk-reward ratio may not mean much if the win rate is very low.    Although the win/loss ratio is used to determine the success rate and probability of future success of stock traders, it is not very useful on its own because it does not take into account the monetary value won or lost in each trade. For example, a win/loss ratio of 2:1 means the trader has twice as many winning trades as losing. Sounds good, but if the losing trades have dollar losses three-times as large as the dollar gains of the winning trades, the trader has a losing strategy.
A :::time_series::: is a sequence of numerical data points in successive order. In investing, a time series tracks the movement of the chosen data points, such as a security’s price, over a specified period of time with data points recorded at regular intervals. There is no minimum or maximum amount of time that must be included, allowing the data to be gathered in a way that provides the information being sought by the investor or analyst examining the activity.
:::Gnosis::: is a decentralized, permission-less blockchain-based platform that caters to the needs of prediction market.      BREAKING DOWN 'Gnosis'     A prediction market offers a platform for participants to make bets on the outcome of an event, like a soccer match or elections, and benefit in case of favorable outcomes. The traditional prediction markets, like betting avenues, are created and controlled by intermediaries, operate opaquely, offer limited market information, and have a scope of mistakes and unfair practices. 
An :::unbiased_predictor::: is a theory that spot prices at some future date will be equal to today's forward rates. However, it does not take into account any risk premiums demanded by the market or changing economic conditions, especially interest rates.    Also called the unbiased expectations hypothesis or expectations theory.
:::The_prediction_market::: is a collection of people speculating on a variety of events — exchange averages, election results, commodity prices, quarterly sales results or even such things as gross movie receipts. The Iowa Electronic Markets, operated by faculty at the University of Iowa Henry B. Tippie College of Business are among the better-known prediction markets in operation.
A :::technical_analyst:::, or technician, is a securities researcher who analyzes investments based on past market prices and technical indicators. Technicians believe that short-term price movements are the result of supply and demand forces in the market for a given security. Thus, for technicians, the fundamentals of the security are less relevant than the current balance of buyers and sellers. Based on the careful interpretation of past trading patterns, technical analysts try to discern this balance with the aim of predicting future price movements.
:::Technically_strong_market::: reflects healthy signals or positive data points from money flow or technical analysis. Common indicators include advance/decline line (A/D), Arms Index (TRIN) and moving averages.
:::Accumulation::: has several definitions in the finance world:    It can refer to an individual investor's cash contributions toward building wealth over a period of time (often for retirement). Many investors go through an accumulation phase in order to create a portfolio of a desired value. During a period of accumulation, the investor often re-invests all dividends and capital gains.     It can also cover an institutional investor's purchase of a large number of shares (i.e., taking a position) in a public company over an extended period of time.     It can mean the retention of company profits for reinvestment in business operations (as opposed to the payout of earnings as dividends to shareholders).
:::Confirmation::: refers to the use of an additional indicator or indicators to substantiate a trend suggested by one indicator. Since technical indicators are not perfect predictors of future price movements, a trader often feels more secure deciding to act on a signal if more than one indicator is sending the same signal. If different indicators send conflicting signals, this is known as divergence.     Confirmation can also refer to a broker's written acknowledgment that they have completed a trade. These can be in electronic or paper form, and record information such as the date, price, commission, fees and settlement terms of the trade. Brokers typically send a confirmation within one week of the trade's completion.    Technical indicators fall into four broad categories: trend, momentum, volatility and volume. When seeking confirmation for a trade signal provided by one indicator, it is usually best to look to an indicator from a different category. Otherwise, the same or similar inputs are counted multiple times, giving the illusion of confirmation when in fact little new information has been taken into account.    Trend indicators include moving averages, moving average convergence divergence (MACD) and the parabolic SAR. Momentum indicators include the stochastic oscillator, the commodity channel index (CCI) and the relative strength index (RSI). Volatility indicators include Bollinger Bands, standard deviation and average true range (ATR). Volume indicators include the Chaikin Oscillator (also used to measure momentum), on-balance volume (OBV) and the volume rate of change. (To learn more, see: How do Traders Identify Confirmation of Prices on a Chart?)    Confirmation Example    Suppose a trader notices a golden cross, which occurs when the 50-day moving average, crosses above the 200-day moving average. This is a signal to buy the stock, based on a trend indicator (the moving averages). Because this signal alone does not guarantee higher prices, the trader might seek confirmation from a different type of indicator. In this case, a high trading volume would reinforce the buy signal, while lower volumes might make the trader reconsider taking a position in the stock. The OBV indicator would, therefore, be a logical choice to confirm the trade: a rising OBV would confirm the golden cross' bullish signal, while a flat or falling OBV would suggest that the price is nearing a top. 
A :::corporate_raider::: is an investor who buys a large number of shares in a corporation whose assets appear to be undervalued. The large share purchase would give the corporate raider significant voting rights, which could then be used to push changes in the company's leadership and management. This would increase share value and thus generate a massive return for the raider.
A :::white_knight::: is an individual or company that acquires a corporation on the verge of being taken over by an unfriendly bidder/acquirer, otherwise known as a black knight. Although the target company does not remain independent, acquisition by a white knight is still preferred to a hostile takeover. Unlike a hostile takeover, current management typically remains in place in a white knight scenario, and investors receive better compensation for their shares.
:::Lady_Macbeth_strategy::: is a corporate takeover scheme in which a third party poses as a white knight to gain trust, but then turns around and joins with the unfriendly party in a hostile takeover bid. Behind the scenes the hostile bidder and supposed white knight to the target company will collude to achieve their aim of acquiring a company that is trying to resist the attempt. 
A :::takeover::: occurs when an acquiring company makes a bid in an effort to assume control of a target company, often by purchasing a majority stake in the target firm. If the takeover goes through, the acquiring company becomes responsible for all of the target company’s operations, holdings, and debt. When the target is a publicly traded company, the acquiring company makes an offer for all of the target’s outstanding shares.
:::Range::: refers to the difference between the low and high prices for a security or index over a specific time period. Range defines the price spread for a defined period, such as a day, month or year, and indicates the security’s price volatility. The more volatile the security or index, the wider the range. The range expands over greater time periods; a security’s daily range is typically smaller than its 52-week range, which in turn is tighter than its five-year or 10-year range. Technical analysts closely follow ranges since they are useful in pinpointing entry and exit points for trades. Investors and traders may refer to a range, as a price range or trading range.     BREAKING DOWN 'Range'    The range depends on the type of security; and for a stock, the sector in which it operates. For example, the range for fixed-income instruments is much tighter than that for commodities and equities, which are more volatile in price. Even for fixed-income instruments, a Treasury bond or government security typically has a smaller trading range than a junk bond or convertible security.    Many factors affect a security’s price, and hence its range. Macroeconomic factors such as the economic cycle and interest rates have a significant bearing on the price of securities over lengthy time periods. A recession, for instance, can dramatically widen the price range for most equities as they plunge in price. For example, most technology stocks had wide price ranges between 1998 to 2002, as they soared to lofty levels in the first half of that period and then slumped – many to single-digit prices – in the aftermath of the dotcom bust. Similarly, the 2007-08 financial crisis considerably widened the trading range for equities due to the broad correction that saw most indices plunge over 50% in price. Stock ranges have narrowed significantly since the Great Recession as volatility has reduced during a nine-year bull market.     Ranges and Volatility     Since price volatility is equivalent to risk, a security’s trading range is a good indicator of risk. A conservative investor prefers securities with smaller price fluctuations compared to securities that are susceptible to significant gyrations. Such an investor may prefer to invest in more stable sectors like utilities, healthcare and telecommunications, rather than in more cyclical (or high-beta) sectors like financials, technology and commodities. Generally speaking, high-beta sectors may have wider ranges than low-beta sectors.     Range Support and Resistance     A security's range can effectively highlight support and resistance levels. If the bottom of a stock's range has been around $10 on a number of occasions spanning many months or years, then the $10 region would be considered an area of strong support. If the stock breaks below that level (especially on heavy volume), traders interpret it as a bearish signal. Conversely, a breakout above a price that has marked the top of the range on numerous occasions is considered as a breach of resistance and provides a bullish signal. (To learn more, see: How do I Effectively Create a Range-Bound Trading Strategy?)
:::Momentum::: is the rate of acceleration of a security's price or volume. In technical analysis, momentum is considered an oscillator and is used to help identify trend lines.    In general, momentum refers to the force or speed of movement; it is usually defined as a rate. In the world of investments, momentum refers to the rate of change on price movements for a particular asset – that is, the speed at which the price is changing.    BREAKING DOWN 'Momentum'     Once a momentum trader sees acceleration in a stock's price, earnings or revenues, the trader will often take a long or short position in the stock in the hope that its momentum will continue in either an upward or downward direction. This strategy relies on short-term movements in a stock's price rather than fundamental value.
:::Market_momentum::: is a measure of overall market sentiment that can support buying and selling with and against market trends. There are several market factors and indicators that can help an investor to follow market momentum.
:::Earnings_momentum::: occurs when corporate earnings per share (EPS) growth is accelerating or decelerating from the prior fiscal quarter or fiscal year. Earnings momentum typically coincides with accelerating revenues and expanding margins caused by increased sales, cost improvements or overall market expansion.    Earnings momentum is also an investment strategy that attempts to invest in companies experiencing an increase in share price due to positive earnings momentum, or growth in EPS.
:::The_Ultimate_Oscillator::: is a technical indicator that was developed by Larry Williams in 1976 to measure momentum across multiple timeframes. By using the weighted average of three different timeframes, the indicator has less volatility and fewer trade signals compared to other indicators that rely on a single timeframe.
:::Uptick_volume::: refers to the volume of shares traded while a stock price is rising. It’s one of many indicators used by investors to make buy and sell decisions.
:::Overbought::: refers to a security that analysts or traders believe is trading above its true value. Overbought generally describes recent or short-term movement in the price of the security, and reflects an expectation that the market will correct the price in the near future. This belief is often the result of technical analysis of the security’s price history.     BREAKING DOWN 'Overbought'    Overbought refers to a security which has been subject to a persistent upward pressure and that technical analysis suggests is due for a correction. The bullish trend may be due to positive news regarding the underlying company, its industry or the market in general. Upward movement can feed on itself and lead to continued bullishness beyond what many traders consider reasonable. When this is the case, traders refer to the asset as overbought and many will bet on a reversal in price.    Traditionally, the standard indicator of a stock’s value has been the price-earnings ratio (P/E). Analysts and companies have used either publicly reported results or earnings estimates to identify the appropriate price for a particular stock. If a stock’s P/E rises above that of its sector or a relevant index, investors may see it as overvalued and as a smart buying opportunity for long-term investing. This is a form of fundamental analysis, which uses macroeconomic and industry factors to determine a reasonable price for a stock.    The rise of technical analysis has allowed traders to focus on indicators of a stock to forecast price. Indicators include recent price, volume and momentum. Traders use technical tools to identify stocks that have become overvalued in recent trading and refer to these equities as overbought.     Technical Analysis Tools for Identifying Oversold Stocks   Technical analysis has provided traders with increasingly sophisticated calculations to identify overbought stocks. George Lane’s stochastic oscillator, which he developed in the 1950s, examines recent price movements to identify imminent changes in a stock’s momentum and pricing trend. This oscillator laid the foundation for the technical indicator which has become the primary indicator of an overbought stock, the relative strength index (RSI). The RSI measures the power behind price movements over a recent period, typically 14 days, using the following formula:    RSI = 100 - 100/(1 + RS)    RS represents the ratio of average upward movement to downward movement over a specified period of time. A high RSI, generally above 70, signals traders that a stock may be overbought and that the market should correct with downward pressure in the near term. Many traders use pricing channels like Bollinger Bands to confirm the signal that the RSI generates. On a chart, Bollinger Bands lie one standard deviation above and below the exponential moving average of a stock’s recent price. Analysts that identify a stock with a high RSI and a price that is edging toward the high end of its upper Bollinger Band will likely consider it to be overbought.
:::Artificial_Neural_Networks::: (ANN:) are the pieces of a computing system designed to simulate the way the human brain analyzes and processes information. They are the foundations of Artificial Intelligence (AI) and solve problems that would prove impossible or difficult by human or statistical standards. ANN have self-learning capabilities that enable them to produce better results as more data become available.
:::Competitive_intelligence::: is the act of collecting and analyzing actionable information about competitors and the marketplace to form a business strategy. Its aim is to learn everything there is to know about the competitive environment outside your business to make the best possible decisions about how to run it. By design, competitive intelligence gathering must be performed quickly and ethically, must be all-encompassing, and must utilize both published and unpublished sources. It is successful when a business has a detailed enough portrait of the marketplace so that it may anticipate and respond to challenges and problems before they arise.
:::Creative_destruction:::, a term coined by Joseph Schumpeter in "Capitalism, Socialism and Democracy" in 1942, describes the "process of industrial mutation that incessantly revolutionizes the economic structure from within, incessantly destroying the old one, incessantly creating a new one." This occurs when innovation deconstructs long-standing arrangements and frees resources to be deployed elsewhere. Since Schumpeter, the term has been adopted into many other contexts outside of economic theory.
:::Impulse_wave_pattern::: is a technical trading term to describe the strong move in a stock's price coinciding with the main direction of the underlying trend. It is used frequently in discussion of the Elliott Wave Theory, a system for predicting stock price movements. Impulse waves also refer to the strong downward movements in a downtrend.
:::Statistically_significant::: is the likelihood that a relationship between two or more variables is caused by something other than chance. Statistical hypothesis testing is used to determine whether the result of a data set is statistically significant. This test provides a p-value, representing the probability that random chance could explain the result; in general, a p-value of 5% or lower is considered to be statistically significant.
A :::neural_network::: is a series of algorithms that endeavors to recognize underlying relationships in a set of data through a process that mimics the way the human brain operates. Neural networks can adapt to changing input so the network generates the best possible result without needing to redesign the output criteria. The conception of neural networks is swiftly gaining popularity in the area of trading system development.
An :::economic_network::: is a combination of individuals, groups or countries interacting to benefit the community as a whole. The primary goal of the group in an economic network is to strengthen its position in a market.
:::Capitulation::: is when investors give up any previous gains in any security or market by selling their positions during periods of declines. Capitulation can happen at any time, but typically happens during high volume trading and extended declines for securities. A market correction or bear market often leads investors to capitulate or panic sell. The term is a derived from a military term which refers to surrender.
